		ROMANCE OF THE THREE KINGDOMS

			   CONTENTS

INTRODUCTION							7

I. OVERVIEW							8
	KEYBOARD OPERATION                                      9
   	ANIMATION		                                9
   	LOADING THE GAME        				10

II. SETUP AND SCENARIOS						12
	SCENARIOS						13
	SELECTING NUMBER OF PLAYERS  				18
	SELECTING A MASTER					18
	PARAMETERS						18
	COMPUTER STRENGTH					19
	COMPUTER PERSONALITY					19
	VIEWING WARS BETWEEN COMPUTER CONTROLLED MASTERS  	19
	CONFIRMING SELECTIONS					20
	STARTING THE GAME					20

III. MAIN DISPLAY						21
	CALENDAR						23
	STATE AND REGION					23
	MASTER							23
	GOVERNOR						24
	FUNDS							24
	RICE							24
	DEBT							24
	INTEREST RATES						25
	NUMBER OF CASTLES					25
	NUMBER OF BEAUTIFUL WOMEN				25
	NUMBER OF HORSES					25
	LAND VALUE						26

				2

	FLOOD PROBABILITY					26
	POPULATION						26
	PEASANT LOYALTY						26
	EMPLOYED GENERALS					27
	NUMBER OF SOLDIERS					27
	FREE GENERALS						27
	
IV. MAIN DISPLAY COMMANDS					28
	MOVE, COMMAND 1 					28
	WAR,  COMMAND 2						28
	SEND, COMMAND 3						28
	SPECIAL TAX,  COMMAND 4					29
	RECRUIT, COMMAND 5					29
	VIEW, COMMAND 6 					30
	GIVE, COMMAND 7						31
	FLOOD PREVENTION, COMMAND 8				32
	DEVELOP LAND, COMMAND 9					32
	TRAIN SOLDIERS, COMMAND 10				32
	SEARCH, COMMAND 11					33
	PLUNDER, COMMAND 12					33
	BUILD CASTLE, COMMAND 13				34
	COVERT ACTION, COMMAND 14				34
	DIPLOMATIC NEGOTIATIONS, COMMAND 15			35
	TRADE, COMMAND 16					37
	AUTHORIZATION, COMMAND 17				37
	WANDER, COMMAND 18					38
	PASS, COMMAND 19					39
	OTHER, COMMAND 20					39

V.  GENERALS							41
	1. STATUS 						41
	2. POSITION						42
	3. LOYALTY						42
	4. AGE							42
	5. BODY							42
	6. INTELLIGENCE						43

				3

	7. POWER						43
	8. CHARISMA						43
	9. LUCK							44
	10. EXPERIENCE						44
	11. SOLDIERS						44
	12. NAVAL ABILITY					44
	13. JADE SEAL						45
	14. ANIMOSITY TOWARDS YOU				45
	15. SERVICE TO YOU					45
	16. YOUR DAUGHTER IS HIS WIFE				46

VI. EVENTS							47
	SEASONAL EVENTS						47
		SPRING						47
		AUTUMN						47
	NATURAL DISASTERS					47
		FLOODS						47
		PLAGUE						47
		EARTHQUAKES					48
		LOCUSTS						48
		REVOLT						48

VIII. WAR							49
	BATTLE DISPLAY						49
	PLACING UNITS AND SUPPLIES				49
	CONDITIONS FOR VICTORY					49
	BATTLE DISPLAY COMMANDS					51
	MOVE							52
	CHART MARKERS USED ON THE HEX SCREEN			52
		A. NORMAL					53
		B. SWEAR AND MOVE				53
		C. DIVIDE					53
	2. ATTACK						53
		A. REGULAR					54
		B. SIMULTANEOUS ATTACK				54
		C. CHARGE					54

				4

		D. TRICK					54
		E. INCENDIARY ATTACK				54
	3. RETREAT						54
	4. SURRENDER						55
	5. STANDBY						55
	6. VIEW							55

VIII. WHEN A GENERAL IS CAPTURED				56
	A. BEHEAD						56
	B. FREE							56
	C. RECRUIT						56

IX. WHEN A MASTER DIES						57

CHART RELATIONSHIP BETWEEN MASTER AND SUBORDINATE		58

X. HINTS							59

XI. END GAME							61

IN CASE OF DIFFICULTY						61

APPENDIX PRONOUNCING NAMES					62

				5

ROMANCE OF THE THREE KINGDOMS

HISTORICAL NOTES & REFERENCES					63

INTRODUCTION							65
PLOT SUMMARY							68
CHARACTERS							78

1. GUAN YU,  78		23. YAN LIANG, 88	45. ZHANG LU,  95
2. HUANG ZHONG,  78	24. WEI YAN, 88		46. CHENG YU,  96
3. SIMA YI, 78		25. JIANG WEI, 89	47. CHENG PU, 96
4. ZHOU YU, 79		26. XU ZHU, 89		48. DONG ZHUO, 96
5. ZHU GE LIANG, 80	27. JI LING, 89		49. MA SUN, 97
6. CAO CAO, 81		28. YAN YAN, 90		50. MA DAI, 97
7. SUN QUAN, 82		29. HUANG GAI, 90	51. MA TENG, 97
8. ZHAO YUN, 82		30. GONG SUN ZAN, 90	52. MI ZHU, 98
9. ZHANG FEI, 83	31. CAI MAO, 91		53. WEN CHOU, 98
10. MA CHAO, 83		32. GOU YU, 91		54. PANG TONG, 98
11. BIU BEI, 84		33. ZHU GE JIN, 91	55. PANG DE, 99
12. LU BU, 84		34. XU HUANG, 92	56. MENG HUO, 99
13. YI JI, 85		35. XU SHU, 92		57. LU XUN, 100
14. YUAN SHU, 85	36. CAU HONG, 92	58. LI RU, 100
15. YUAN SHAO, 85	37. CAO REN, 93		59. LIU YAN, 100
16. JIA XU, 86		38. CAO PI, 93		60. LIU QI, 100
17. GUO JIA, 86		39. SUN GAN, 93		61. LIU ZHANG, 101
18. KUO TU, 86		40. SUN JIAN, 94	62. LIU CHAN, 101
19. XIA HOU YUAN, 87	41. SUN CE, 94		63. LIU BIAO, 101
20. XIA HOU DUN, 87	42. TAI SHI CI, 94	64. LU MENG, 102
21. GAN NING, 87	43. ZHANG SONG, 95	65. LU SU, 102
22. GUAN PING, 88	44. ZHANG LIAO, 95

CHRONOLOGICAL TABLE OF ROMANCE OF THE THREE KINGDOMS		103
INDEX								107

				6

			INTRODUCTION

China in 190 A.D. was nearing chaos. The Second Han Dynasty, which had
ruled for the previous 165 years, was dying. Law throughout the country was
not coming from the Emperor but from generals who grabbed power where and
when they could. At first no single general controlled more than a handful
of states at most and many states were controlled by no one at all. As time
went on a few generals managed to gradually expand their rule until by 215
A.D. China was divided into three kingdoms called Wei, Wu and Shu, the
ruler of each desperately trying to consolidate the entire country under
himself. This era is referred to as the Three Kingdoms Period. Romance of
The Three Kingdoms is a simulation game that traces China from the chaos
with which the Three Kingdoms began to its rule by one general.

The player takes control of a master, a general capable of commanding as
many states as he can acquire, and, if successful, unifies China. As many
as eight may play, but only one can succeed. There are five chronologically
arranged scenarios. The first has China in its most disorganized period
and the last has virtually all of China controlled by one of three
generals. The precise requirements for success in each of these scenarios
differs(see Setup and Scenarios (P.11-17), but in all cases the goal is to
rule as many states as possible. After the completion of any scenario but
number five the game will automatically advance to the next. You may start
the game at any scenario. Koei's Romance of The Three Kingdoms is based on
an historical novel of the same name written in the Fourteenth Century,
which was in turn based on a more serious official work of history by Ch'en
Shou (233-297 A.D.), who chronicled major historical events in China from
220 to 265 A.D. Your master strives to unite China. You must enlist the
help of others, fight well and negotiate shrewdly. Without able and loyal
subordinates you will not be able to win the game. Choosing good people and
winning their loyalty will not be easy and all the able and loyal
subordinates in the world will not help if diplomatic and military
resources are not used well.

				7

I. OVERVIEW

The first step to entering Romance of The Three Kingdoms is to select a
master. Masters are Warlord that have the ability to govern as many states
(P.23) as they can acquire. All other generals serve masters, or are
available to serve them. You, with your master and his subordinate
generals, will strive to unify the divided states of China. There are five
scenarios set in five successive time periods, with the nation growing
slightly closer to unification in each scenario. The available masters in
each scenario will differ, and so will the requirements for victory. As the
country grows closer to unification the number of masters declines and so
does the number of players. As many as eight may play the first two
scenarios, but by the fifth scenario only three will remain. Success in
scenarios one through four does not mean the end of the game but merely
continuation into the next scenario.

Normally, the screen will show the main display, which features a map
divided into 58 states, and an information box. States will be shaded to
show ownership,  except for empty states which will be left blank. Each
state will give one order a month so the more states you own the more
commands you give. After all states have given an order, one month will be
considered to have passed. The order in which states give commands will
change at random each month. When it is your turn to give an order you will
be prompted by the computer. Hitting return will replace the information
box with a menu. Entering zero will return the information box. To give an
order simply enter the appropriate number and hit return.

When you go to war against another state, or are invaded, the main display
will be replaced with the battle display. The battle display is in concept
similar to the main display, but instead of a map of china a highly
detailed hexagonal map of one particular state is displayed and the data to
the right of the map rather more specialized. As on the main display
hitting return will produce a menu. To give an order on the battle display
enter the appropriate number;there is no need to hit return.

If a war is not over within a month, it will be carried on into the next
month. If the war continues for more than two months you will be allowed to
call in reinforcements from any states you own that borders the state where
the war is taking place.

Should you become dissatisfied with the state or states you control and
decide to abandon them, or should you be taken hostage by another commander
but manage

				8

to escape, it is possible to play as a wander, a master without a country.
A wander can raise an army, take a state and continue to victory.

In this game there are a large number of Chinese names. They may appear
intimidating to native English speakers at first, but most people soon get
used to them. Test players have reported no difficulties as a character's
name is usually presented with his picture and when giving orders you will
be referring to characters by number rather than typing in whole names.
Those interested in pronunciation please read the appendix to this manual.

KEYBOARD OPERATION

Romance of The Three Kingdoms uses the keyboard and the carriage return
key. The keypad may also be used. On the main display hit carriage return
after entering orders, on the battle display return is not usually needed.
When asked a Yes/No question (...(Y/N?) you can respond with Y or N, or by
enter 0 for "Yes" or hitting the carriage return key for "No". For details
on use of the keyboard/keypad when moving units during battle, see the
first part of chapter 6, War. When using the keypad, it is necessary on
some machines to press the "Number Lock" key.

ANIMATION

Animation may be switched on and off using command 20, >Other< (P.39), on
the main display. >Other< may also be used to end and save the game, and to
control the length of time for which on screen messages are displayed.

				9

I. OVERVIEW

LOADING THE GAME

TWO FLOPPY DISK SYSTEMS

After turning on power insert disk A into drive A (1) and disk B into drive
B (2). Reset your computer and the game will begin automatically. Please
note that when the game is terminated it will not be possible to exit to
the operating system, so you will have to reset your computer before
running other software. If your computer has an EGA card in it you will be
asked before the opening menu "Set Game to Color Mode? (Y/N)". If you say
No the game will be played out in a high resolution black and white mode.
If you say Yes the game will be played out in EGA color mode.

Do not reset or turn power off during play. Doing so may damage the disk.

Do not remove the disks during play. Please use command 20, >Other< (P.39)
to stop the game before removing the disks.

Two of your disks will be write protected, one will not be. Please do not
remove or add silver protect seals. If you do you may find yourself unable
to save games or in danger of doing damage to your disks.

CAUTION: Once you have used this product on a machine with a high capacity
disk drive you may not be able to run it again on a machine of lessor
capacity.

HARD DISK USERS

To play Romance of Of The Three Kingdoms on systems with one or more hard
disks and a floppy disk it is necessary to go through a short hard disk
installation procedure and to produce a floppy disk that will be used to
start the game. You will need at least 510KB of space on the hard disk and
PC-DOS version 2.0 or higher.

To install the program to hard disk first see to it that your floppy disk
drive (usually drive one or A) is logged as the current drive and then
insert game disk A. Next enter SAN_A X, with X being the name of your hard
disk drive. Thus if your hard disk is designated C, enter SAN_A C. Hit
return and when "Complete" is displayed on the screen remove the A game
disk from your floppy disk drive and insert the B game disk.

With the B game disk inserted in your floppy drive, type SAN_B X, with X
being the name of your hard drive. Thus if your hard drive is designated C,
enter SAN_B C. Hit return and when Complete is displayed on the screen
remove the B game disk from your floppy drive.

If you have made modifications to your operating system there is a chance
the program will not run properly. For this reason you may want to make a
game start disk containing unmodified DOS. To do this, follow the
procedures below: Take a new floppy disk and put it in your floppy disk
drive. Use PC-DOS to format the disk. For double sided, double density
disks and drives the command is:

			Format X: /4 /S

For other drives the command is:

			Format X: /S

In both cases the X is the name of the floppy disk drive.

Once the above procedures are complete, use the following steps to begin
play:

1. Turn computer power on, insert the game start disk in your floppy disk
   drive and reset the computer.
2. After DOS is running insert game disk A into drive A (1).
3. Change currently logged drive to hard disk.
4. Make sure you are in the root directory and enter SANGOKU.

The game should begin. When the game is finished,  you will exit to the
operating system.

				11

II. SETUP AND SCENARIOS

After the game has begun running but before play starts, it is necessary to
go through a brief setup.

NEW GAME/LOAD DATA

If you wish to continue a game saved earlier select "2" for Load data.
Otherwise, select "1" for New game.

SCENARIO SELECTION

Romance of The Three Kingdoms may be played with any one of five possible
scenarios. They each present slightly different challenges, but are equally
difficult. Since successful completion of scenarios one to four means
continuation of the game at the next scenario until unification in scenario
five, total play time will be shorter by beginning with a latter scenario.
Remember, a master is a Warlord with the power to control as many states as
he can acquire. In most scenarios most masters will start with more than
one state.

				12

SCENARIO 1: A CHAOTIC WORLD

A. STARTING DATE
189 A.D.

B. HISTORICAL BACKGROUND

In 189 A.D., Ho Chin, a relative of the Emperor, plotted to murder the
palace eunuchs with the help of masters Yuan Shao and Yuan Shu. However,
the plan leaked out and the eunuchs, deciding the best defense was a good
offense,  murdered Ho Chin. All of this put the palace in a great deal of
confusion. A general named Dong Zhuo took advantage of this to attack the
palace and appoint himself emperor.

Afraid of Dong Zhuo and his rule, Yuan Shao, Yuan Shu, Cao Cao and a number
of others masters fled the capital of Loyang. However, before long these
generals grew tired of Dong Zhuo's overbearing tyranny and gathered
together in Loyang again to overthrow him. Dong Zhuo, aware of great danger
around him, moved his capital to Ch'angan after burning most of the city of
Loyang to the ground. No masters were hurt in the fire.

C. CONDITIONS FOR VICTORY

Your goal is to conquer any 30 states or more, and to rule either of two
capital cities, Loyang (state 20) or Ch'angan (state 21).

D. HEROES			MASTER		MASTER'S STATES

Masters you can select		Kong Rong	#8, #9
				Gong Zan	#3
				Tao Qian	#10, #11
				Ma Teng		#25, #26
				Wang Lang	#31
				Liu Yao		#28

Other Masters			MASTER		MASTER'S STATES

(not selectable)		Cao Cao		#7
				Sun Jian	#41
				Liu Bei		#14
				Yuan Shao	#4, #5
				Yuan Shu	#37, #38
				Liu Biao	#39, #40
				Dong Zhou	#18, #19, #20, #21
				Liu Yan		#47, #48, #49

				13

SCENARIO 2: THE EMERGENCE OF CAO CAO

A. STARTING DATE
195 A.D.

B. HISTORICAL BACKGROUND

In 192 A.D., Governor Wang Yu convinced the deceitful Lu Bu, Emperor Dong
Zhuo's right hand man, to assassinate Zhuo. Zhuo's death led to a power
vacuum with every master in the country trying to become emperor. The
struggle became violent and many deaths resulted. Sun Jian was killed
during the fighting with Liu Biao and was succeeded by his son, Sun Ce.

In 198 A.D. Cao Cao killed Lu Bu and laid the foundation for the future Wei
Dynasty.

C. CONDITIONS FOR VICTORY

Your goal is to conquer more than 30 states and to rule either of two
capital cities, Loyang (state 20) or Ch'angan (state 21).

D. HEROES			MASTER		MASTER'S STATES

Masters you can select		Cao Cao		#13, #19, #20
				Sun Ce		#28, #32
				Liu Bei		#10, #11
				Yuan Shao	#4, #5
				Yuan Shu	#29, #30, #37, #38
				Liu Biao	#39, #40, #41, #42
				Liu Zhang	#23, #47, #48, #49, #50
				Yu Bu		#6, #7

OTHER MASTERS			MASTER		MASTER'S STATES

				Gong Zan	#2, #3
				Yang Feng	#12
				Li Jue		#21, #22
				Wang Lang	#31
				Ma Teng		#24, #25, #26, #27

				14

SCENARIO 3: THE OPENING OF A NEW AGE

A. STARTING DATE
201 A.D.

B. HISTORICAL BACKGROUND

In 199 A.D., Yuan Shao won an important battle against Gong Zan and
steadily extended his power north. During this time, Liu Bei was wandering,
taking shelter with Yuan Shao sometimes and with Liu Biao at others. Su Ce,
who succeeded Sun Jian, was assassinated at the age of 26, and in turn was
succeeded by his younger brother Sun Quan.

The whole empire was in a state of confusion. Yuan Shao had so many
northern states that he was known by this time as the Wolf Of The North.
Cao Cao wanted these states and made up his mind to take them.

C. CONDITIONS FOR VICTORY

Your goal is to rule more than 40 states.

D. HEROES

Masters you can select		MASTER		MASTER'S STATES

				Cao Cao		#6, #7, #12, #13, #19, #20
				Sun Quan	#28, #31, #32, #33
				Liu Bei		#37
				Yuan Shao	#38, #39, #40, #41, #42,
						#43, #44
				Liu Biao	#45, #46, #47, #48, #49,
						#50, #52
				Ma Teng		#24, #25, #26, #27

There are no other masters in this scenario.

				15

SCENARIO 4: THE BATTLE OF RED WALL

A. STARTING DATE
208 A.D.

B. HISTORICAL BACKGROUND

Yuan Shao was killed in battle and Cao Cao defeated Yuan's sons, Yuan Shang
and Yuan Tan so Cao Cao came to dominate the North. Liu Zhang and Sun Quan
dominated the South, but Liu Bei was unable to firmly establish himself
anywhere.

In 207 A.D. Liu Bei recruited Zhu Ge Liang as a military advisor. Together
they took the region of Jingzhou, states 37, 38, 39, and 40. The newly
powerful Liu Bei allied himself with Sun Quan and fought Cao Cao in 208
A.D. in what became known as The Battle of Red Wall. This battle signified
the start of the ultimate phase of the Three Kingdoms Period.

C. CONDITIONS FOR VICTORY

Your goal is to rule more than 40 states.

D. HEROES			MASTER		MASTER'S STATES

Masters you can select		Cao Cao         #1, #2, #3, #4, #5, #6, #7,
						#9, #12, #13, #16, #18,
						#20, #21
				Sun Quan	#28, #31, #32, #33, #34,
						#35, #36
				Liu Bei		#37, #38, #39, #40
				Liu Zhang	#46, #47, #48, #49, #50,
						#51, #52, #53
				Ma Teng		#24, #25, #26, #27

Other Masters			MASTER		MASTER'S STATES

				Zhang Lu	#22, #23, #45
				Liu Du		#44
				Zhao Fan	#43
				Jin Xuan	#42
				Han Xuan	#41

				16

SCENARIO 5:THE AGE OF THE THREE KINGDOMS

A. STARTING DATE
215 A.D.

B. HISTORICAL BACKGROUND

Sun Quan and Liu Bei won the Battle of Red Wall and started to build up
their respective power bases. The country was effectively split into three
parts:The Wei Kingdom of Cao Cao, the Wu Kingdom of Sun Quan, and the Shu
Kingdom of Liu Bei. The field has been narrowed down to three masters and
their generals. The only question is which one of these three will defeat
the other two and unify China.

C. OBJECTIVE

Conquer the whole empire

D. HEROES			MASTER		MASTER'S STATES

Masters you can select		Cao Cao		1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9,
						10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16,
						17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23,
						24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30,
						37
				Sun Quan	28, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36,
						39, 41, 43, 55, 56, 57, 58
				Liu Bei         23, 38, 40, 42, 44, 45, 46,
						47, 48, 49, 50, 51, 52

Other Masters			MASTER		MASTER'S STATES

				Yong Kai	53, 54

				17

SELECTING NUMBER OF PLAYERS

As many people may play as there are available masters in a scenario. When
prompted, please enter number of players. If 0 is entered the computer will
play a demonstration game against itself. To end the demonstration game
press the Esc key.

SELECTING A MASTER

After selecting a scenario each player must choose a master. The screen
will display the portraits of available masters and the basic values of the
parameters that define each master's personality. Masters not controlled by
a human player will be controlled by the computer. When a master has been
chosen the player's number will appear by the masters name.

The strength of a master's situation at the beginning of the game varies
according to the scenario being played and the master's parameters. It is
possible to win with any hero and, though no hero can guarantee victory,
the game is easier with a hero who starts out in an advantageous position.
Thus, in the latter two scenarios Cao Cao and Sun Quan are in very strong
positions while it would prove extremely difficult to unify China in
scenario one with Liu Bei,  who starts in a very disadvantageous position.
Simply checking this manual under Scenarios to see how many states a master
owns at the beginning of the game is as good a gauge of success as any.

PARAMETERS

A master's personality is governed by five parameters: Health,
Intelligence, Power, Charisma, and Luck, each with a maximum value of 100
points. The higher the value, the stronger the parameter. However, these
values are not set in stone and can be changed both during play and setup.
During setup the screen will display a list of parameters for each hero and
next to each parameter a rapidly and randomly changing number. Hitting the
space bar once will set the first parameter, hitting it again will set the
second and so on. By hitting the space bar five times you will have set all
a master's parameters. The numbers are random but weighted so that you'll
find the parameters you have set will tend

				18

to be close to the basic parameters displayed in the previous screen. If
dissatisfied you will be offered a chance to try again. The trick is to
remember that you can not change only one element and it is nearly
impossible to get really high values for all parameters. Thus, you will
have to decide which parameters you value most and which you would be
willing to sacrifice, say intelligence over charisma (P.43).

COMPUTER STRENGTH

When asked to select computer strength, enter a number from one to ten. The
greater the number the more resources computer controlled masters will
start with, the smarter they'll be in battle and the worse natural disasters
(P.47) will become. Entering one will produce a living nightmare for even
the most advanced players.

COMPUTER PERSONALITY

You may set the computer's personality as either warlike or rational.
Warlike means computer controlled masters will attack frequently, even
recklessly. When set to rational, computer controlled generals don't become
pacifists. They wait to attack until they see an almost certain victory.
The game is significantly more difficult to win with the computer set to a
rational personality.

VIEWING WARS BETWEEN COMPUTER CONTROLLED MASTERS

Heroes not controlled by a human player are controlled by the computer.
During the course of the game, computer controlled masters will frequently
invade each other. If you select to watch, the main display will change to
the battle display and you will see these battles in great details. If you
elect not to watch, the results will be displayed on the main display.
Observing others' battles can be entertaining but it will extend playing
time a great deal.

				19

CONFIRMING SELECTIONS

At the end of the setup phase you will be asked if you would like to change
any of the selections made. If so, you will be offered a menu that lets you
change from a new game to a continuation of an old one, change scenarios,
heroes or the computer's strength. You will also be offered the option of
making no change at all.

STARTING THE GAME

Pressing any key after confirming satisfaction with current selections will
start the game.

				20

III. MAIN DISPLAY

Except during battle, the game will be played out on the main display. The
left hand side of the main display is taken up with a map of China while
the right displays information about your state or the state you are
viewing.

				(PICTURE)

1. COMMANDER: Master giving orders.
2. STATE: The state to which the data pertains. Identical to state listed
   above display except when display has been called with View command. See
   Commands for details.

				21

3. REGION: Name of region in which state is located.
4. DATE: Current date.
5. MASTER: Owner of the state. Except when display has been called with
   command 6 >View< (P.30), identical to commander.
6. GOVERNOR: Administrator of the state.
7. FUNDS: Cash available.
8. RICE: Rice available.
9. DEBT: Money owed to the merchant. Other debts do not show up here.
10. INTEREST: Rate of interest currently being charged by the merchant.
11. COST OF RICE: Amount of rice that may be bought per unit of gold.
12. CASTLES: Number of castles in the state.
13. BEAUTIFUL WOMEN: Number of beautiful women in the court available to
    present as gifts.
14. HORSES: Number of horses available to give as gifts.
15. METAL IN STORE: Amount of metal available to make weapons (P.44) from.
16. LAND VALUE: Value of land in the state.

				22

17. FLOOD PROBABILITY: Chance (%) of flood (P.47) occurring.
18. POPULATION: Total population of the state.
19. PEASANT LOYALTY: Loyalty of peasants to the governor.
20. EMPLOYED GENERALS: Number of generals serving the governor.
21. TOTAL SOLDIERS: Sum of employed generals' (P.43) forces.
22. FREE GENERALS: Number of generals openly in the state who serve no
    master.

CALENDAR

You will notice that at the top of the display the month and year are
displayed. Ancient China used the lunar calendar. January to March is
spring (P.47): April to June is summer: July to September is autumn (P.47):
and October to December is winter. The master will get old in spring, and
military funds and food will be collected in autumn. At the beginning of
each season there may be a disaster such as plague, locusts, or flood. See
chapter7, Events, for details.

STATE AND REGION

All states have numbers, all regions have names. The map is divided into a
total of fifteen regions, each region containing several states. There are
some variations among individual states but regions tend to be fairly
uniform in terms of flood probability, peasant loyalty, available of metal
and so forth. It can be useful to know what kind of regions your states are
in. The View command can provide a map which shows each region and gives a
written description of it. See Commands for details.

MASTER

A master controls, or is capable of controlling, more than one state. When
a 

				23

master does not personally control a state, he gives orders to the general
(appointed governor) who controls it for him. All masters are generals
though not all generals are masters. The terms "hero"and "master"are
completely interchangeable.

GOVERNOR

When a master is not personally in a state a governor will be automatically
appointed for him from among subordinate generals. Subordinates with
charisma (P.42) and high loyalty will be selected. States you own but
aren't in, you administer by giving orders to the state's governor. Should
a governor defect to another master he will take the state with him, so be
careful to maintain your governor's loyalty. Should you have so many states
that giving orders to each governor individually is burdensome you may
authorize a governor to administer a state without orders from you. Use
command 17,  >Authorization< (P.38) to bestow and remove authorization.
Command 17 can only be given from the state the master is in.

FUNDS

Funds refers to cash on hand-money that may be used for flood prevention
work, development projects, war, and a variety of other things. At the
beginning of autumn each year (July to September) taxes are collected and
added to funds. The amount of taxes collected will reflect conditions in
the state, the population,  the value of land and the loyalty of the
people. Funds may also be increased by selling rice or obtaining loans from
the merchant or from other masters.

RICE

Rice is collected in autumn every year as part of taxes. The amount of rice
collected will vary with the same factors that affect the amount of money
collected. Rice may also be obtained from the merchant or other masters. It
is as essential as money during war. You should keep as large a stock of
rice on hand as you can afford.

				24

DEBT

Money can be borrowed from the merchant with command 16 >Trade< (P.37). Debt
is the sum owed the merchant and is equal to the loan plus interest. Every
autumn (P.47) the computer will automatically take from your funds to pay
your debts. If you do not have sufficient funds to cover the debt the loan
will be carried over to the following year. The figure displayed for debt
does not include the value of loans taken from other masters, which you
must remember yourself. Loans from other masters bear no interest so only
the principal need to be returned.

INTEREST RATES

Interest rates are posted by the computer every year in the spring (P.47)
but they are not the same in all states. The price of rice is set in line
with the interest rate thus helping to make it possible to repay debt by
selling rice.

NUMBER OF CASTLES

A castle functions as a town. More castles means economic power. More
economic power means more tax. You can build additional castles with
command 13, >Build Castles< (P.34).

NUMBER OF BEAUTIFUL WOMEN

During the period of Chinese history in which Romance of The Three Kingdoms
is set it was common for a master to give court ladies as gifts to generals
he wished to recruit. In the game too, beautiful women may be given to
generals you wish to recruit using command 5, >Recruit< (P.29). No state
will have any of these court ladies in the beginning but they may be
obtained with command 12, >Plunder< (P.34). Plunder does not, however,
assure you of finding beautiful women. Some states have many, some have
few, some none at all.

				25

NUMBER OF HORSES

Like ladies, horses may be given to generals as gifts. From the beginning
of the game each state has a set number of horses and this figure can not
be increased.

LAND VALUE

Land value refers to the agricultural productivity of the state and has a
great influence on the amount of tax collected each fall. Land value may be
increased with command 9, >Cultivate< (P.32) but may not exceed a maximum
value of 200 points.

FLOOD PROBABILITY

There are two major rivers in China, the Yellow River and the Yangtze
river. Floods occur frequently in the summer and states close to these
rivers may suffer serious damage. The probability of flood (P.47) increases
three points during the summer, and further rises with damage from previous
floods. The chance of flood may, however, be lowered with command 8, 
>Flood Prevention< (P.32).

POPULATION

Population is the total number of people in the country excluding soldiers.
The size of a state's population directly affects its productivity. A small
population means less money and rice at tax time. Population will increase
20% in the spring(P.47)but decline when you recruit soldiers with command
5, >Recruit< (P.29).

PEASANT LOYALTY

Low peasant loyalty means reduced productivity and increases the chances of
both plague (P.47) and revolt (P.48). Natural disasters (P.47), the levying
of special taxes,  plunder and trading land with only masters will lower
loyalty.

				26

Loyalty will also decrease automatically at the end of every season.
However, it may be increased by giving the people rice or gold with command
7, >Give< (P.31). Loyalty may not exceed 100 and anything below 70 is cause
for concern.

EMPLOYED GENERALS

Employed generals are the governor's (or master's) subordinates. It is
these generals and their troops who fight wars and carry out other tasks.
The maximum number of generals that may be in a state is 28. However, it is
not wise to put too many generals in one state at a time. As a rule, a
maximum of 15 is best.

NUMBER OF SOLDIERS

The total number of soldiers under all generals in a state equals the total
number of soldiers in that state. That number has a very direct bearing on
a state's military power. You can increase the number of soldiers with
command 5, >Recruit< (P.29). The number of soldiers will decrease if
casualties are suffered during a war or if natural disaster (P.47) strikes.

FREE GENERALS

There are two types of generals:employed, who serve a master, and free, who
do not serve anyone. Some free generals are known publicly, others are
hidden. The number beside Free Generals refers to free generals who are
known to others. Hidden generals can be found with command 11, >Search<
(P.33). In order to succeed in Romance of The Three Kingdoms you will need
as many generals as you can get. Free generals in your own state can be
worn more easily than those in other states (P.23). A large number of free
generals indicates that a country has great potential power. See Chapter 5,
Generals, for more details.

				27

IV. MAIN DISPLAY COMMANDS

Hitting return on the main display will produce a command menu and entering
zero on the command menu will return the main display to the screen.
Commands are entered by typing in the appropriate number and then hitting
return.

COMMAND 1, >MOVE<

Command 1 allows you to move generals, together with their soldiers, to any
empty state or owned by you and not at war. If you move to an empty state,
you gain that state automatically. If you move during winter some of your
soldiers will freeze to death. Since troops carry rice and gold with them
when they move you can also use this command as a nearly risk free way to
move supplies between neighboring states. It is not possible to move in
northern states during winter.

COMMAND 2, >WAR<

"War" is the command you use to invade a neighboring state. After entering
command 2 you will be asked to choose the generals you will send in to
fight,  appoint a commander-in-chief among the generals and determine the
amount of gold and rice you will give the invasion force to use. The screen
will then change to the battle display, on which the war will commence.
Note that you cannot attack a state at war with a third master. If a war is
not over inside a month (30 days) it will be continued the following month.
See Chapter 6, War, for more details.

COMMAND 3, >SEND<

Send in used to move rice and gold from one of your states to another.
Note, however, you may not send to or from a state at war. No generals
accompanies the transport party so the risk of theft by either an enemy or
bandits is great, especially if a great quantity of goods is being sent or
if the distance 

				28

involved are large. If you wish to send supplies to one of your states
(P.23) at war use command 2, >War< (P.28) to send in a general from a
bordering state heavily laden with supplies. To move a large quantity of
goods to a neighboring state safely use command 1, >Move< (P.28) to send a
single general, together with his troops, to the state carrying the goods.

During winter the northern half of the country experiences extreme cold so
you cannot use command 3 in northern states (P.23), nor can you move
supplies any other way.

COMMAND 4, >SPECIAL TAX<

Should you get into financial trouble command 4 allows you to impose a
special, temporary tax. Command 4 cannot be used in autumn (P.47) when
regular taxes are collected and may only be given once a year. Loyalty of
the people in the state effected will decrease every time special taxes are
imposed.

COMMAND 5, >RECRUIT<

Recruit has three separate uses; employing generals, enlisting men for the
army and redistributing soldiers among generals.

A. RECRUITING GENERALS

You can recruit both employed and free generals. If you manage to recruit a
general who has been appointed governor his state will become yours. Most
of the other generals in that state will come over to you, though a few
with a great deal of loyalty to the old master may leave the state. Command
five can also be useful in wars lasting more than a month, since you can
use it to pick up generals fighting against you.

Command 5 can only be given by the master himself, so you cannot give it
from a state the master is not in. A general you have recruited from
another master's land will come to your state unless he is a governor. If a
governor, he will stay in place and continue to serve as governor, but
under you rather than the old master.

To recruit a general send gifts suitable to your target's personality. Use
command 6, >View< (P.30) to assess loyalty. When you go after generals in
service,  look for those with low loyalty and, ideally, large numbers of
troops. Following

				29

is a description of the options available under command five.

	a. Write a letter. The chances are fairly low, but it costs
	   nothing.
	b. Send money. This will be most effective with the less bright
           generals.
	c. Send a horse. This will especially please those with high power
           but lower intelligence(P.42).
	d. Send a woman. This will especially please those with high power
           but lower intelligence(P.42). Women can only be obtained by
           >Plunder<, command 12.
	e. Visit in person. This is the most effective way to win generals
           with less power but high intelligence. However, should you jaunt
           off to some remote land, there is a very real risk of your being
           caught by the the enemy.

B. RECRUITING SOLDIERS

You can hire soldiers from among the peasants in your state and allocate
them to yourself or your generals. Each general may have a maximum of 20,
000 soldiers. You need to pay 10 points of money and 100 points of rice for
every 100 soldiers you employ. However, if the population is less than the
total number of soldiers (P.44) you will not be allowed to recruit
soldiers.

C. REORGANIZATION

In order to redistribute soldiers among the generals, first reduce the
number of troops under some of generals. These soldiers may then be
redistributed to other generals.

COMMAND 6, >VIEW<

View is used to obtain information on states, generals and regions. All
information is free though obtaining information about states and generals
other than you own is counted as an order and means giving up the chance to
do anything else that turn.

A. STATES

Detailed information on the social and economic conditions in any
particular state and about the generals in that state. After selecting this
option you will be asked what state to check and presented with another
menu. You may chose to view;

	a. Employed Generals. Generals under the governor in that state.

				30

	b. Attacking generals. If that state is at war data on the generals
           involved.
	c. Free Generals. Generals who serve no master but who openly live
           in that state.
	d. Wandering generals. Masters who have become wanders and are in
           that state.
	e. Generals, summary. Summary in chart form of all generals in that
           state.
	f. Social, economic status. Produces a data chart for that state
	   identical to the main display.
	g. View other state. Use View to look at another state. You may
	   look at as many states (P.23) as wish during one turn.
	h. End View. Stops view. If you have been using View to examine
	   other masters' states (P.23) your turn will end with End View.
	   If you have viewing your own states you will be allowed to give
	   another order.

B. SUMMARY OF TERRITORY

A table listing states under your command, their governors, and the states'
economic and social condition.

C. SUMMARY OF GENERALS

A table listing generals in the state, their position (P.43), parameters
and other information.

D. REGIONAL MAP

The nation is divided into geographical regions. Knowing the sorts of
regions your states are in can be a great advantage. The regional map will
give you this information. You can give another order after viewing the
regional map.

COMMAND 7, >GIVE<

A. GIVE TO THE PEASANTS

You can give the peasants money or food, which will increase their loyalty.
Both

				31

will be received equally gratefully. If you give more than 5, 000 units of
rice maximum value of rice is 100 your charisma (P.42) will rise.

B. Give to a general

You can give a general money, food, books, or women, which will increase
his loyalty to you. Generals will often distribute part of the gifts they
receive among their soldiers, thus raising the loyalty of the army. The
generals prefer money over food, all other things being equal. 

When you give books to a general, his intelligence (P.42) level will rise
by one point so long as there is another general in the same state who has
an IQ two points higher than the general to whom you gave the books. The
books themselves will cost five points of money. If you give a women,
especially to physically strong generals, their loyalty to you will sharply
rise.

COMMAND 8, >FLOOD PREVENTION<

Flood prevention work will lessen the probability of flood (P.47). The
amount of increase in flood protection you get with every application of
command 8 varies with the amount of money you allocate and the intelligence
(P.42), luck (P.43) and experience (P.43) of the general you put in charge.

COMMAND 9, >DEVELOP LAND<

Command 9 is used to cultivate new fields in order to increase the
productivity of your land, and thus its value. As with flood (P.47)
prevention work, the results you get will vary depending on funds allocated
and the general put in charge.

COMMAND 10, >TRAIN SOLDIERS<

Command 10 enhances the effectiveness of all soldiers in a state. It is the
only way to increase military power without spending money.

				32

COMMAND 11, >SEARCH<

Command 11 can be used to search for any of the things listed below. The
more luck (P.43) and intelligence (P.42) the general conducting the search
has the more likely he is to be successful. In order to conduct a search
you will need between three and four units of money.

A. METAL

Search for metal to make weapons (P.44). You should use command 6, >View<
(P.30) to check the regional map of the area before you execute this
command for if a state has no iron deposits you have no chance of finding
metal.

B. FUNDS

Search for a gold mine. If you are lucky enough to find one, funds will
increase. Success will depend largely on luck (P.43). The regional map may
provide some information, but only some.

C. PERSONNEL

Search for hidden free generals (P.43). After locating a hidden general you
should use command 5 to recruit him. If you succeed he will become your
subordinates.

D. JADE SEAL

If no master has a jade seal, it means it has been dropped in one of the
states (P.23). You can search for the jade seal using this command.

COMMAND 12, >PLUNDER<

>PLUNDER< allows you to have a general tear your state apart looking for
gold, rice and females. Since plunder entails breaking into homes, stealing
private property and dragging away women it displeases the people and their
loyalty to you will sharply, as will your charisma (P.42). Your subordinate
generals will react in different ways. Generals with high power (P.42)
factors will be pleased and their loyalty to you will increase, while those
with high intelligence (P.42) will lament your conduct and their loyalty to
you will drop sharply.

				33

COMMAND 13, >BUILD CASTLE<

Command 13 is used to build additional castles. If you enter this command
and have the funds available, a hexagonal map of the state will appear.
Locations where it is possible to erect a castle will be marked with an
oval.

It will take about a year to complete construction of a new castle. While a
castle is under construction, an X mark will appear on the hexagonal map. A
castle represents a town where taxes are collected and serves as a
defensive base when the state is under attack. For these reasons, it is
generally worth investing in castles even though the initial price may be
rather steep and the wait until completion long.

COMMAND 14,  >COVERT ACTION<

Military means are not always the best way to achieve your objectives.
Covert action allows you to send one of your generals against an enemy
without all the risks associated with full scale war. Generals may be sent
on any of the following missions:

A. SPREAD RUMORS ABOUT THE MASTER

If believed, a nasty rumor about the master will lower loyalty among enemy
generals.

B. CONFUSE THE PEOPLE.

Spread stories that will confuse the inhabitants and lower their loyalty to
the master.

C. SET FIRE TO THE ENEMY'S RICE

Set the enemy state's food storehouse on fire. If successful you may
destroy as much as one third of the enemy's food supply.

You must, however, be careful with all these operations. If your agent is
not skillful enough to deceive the enemy, or if there is a highly
intelligent generals in the enemy state, your operation may be discovered
before it is carried out. If so, your messenger will probably be executed
and it is quite likely the enemy will seek revenge.

				34

Covert action is a powerful tool. For example, by constantly repeating bad
rumors about his master you may be able to lower a governor's loyalty
enough that he will easily be swayed to defect to you, giving you a state
without having to fight a war.

COMMAND 15, >DIPLOMATIC NEGOTIATIONS<

Use Diplomatic negotiations to negotiate with other masters. Select the
master you wish to negotiate with and send a messenger to the state the
master is in. Success will depend partly on your charisma (P.42) and on the
charisma, luck (P.43) and intelligence (P.42) of the messenger but mostly
on your past dealings with the other master. If you have recently fought
against him, failed to pay debts to him, ignored his requests for
negotiations or have recruited his generals, you will almost certainly be
refused in any loans, for instance. If your charisma is low, or you send a
messenger with an extremely low loyalty to a master with high charisma, it
is quite possible your messenger will defect to the other master's side. It
is also possible your messenger will be killed.

You don't need enemies if you can avoid them, especially powerful ones
sitting on your borders. If using command 15, or command 6, >View< (P.30),
you discover another master feels extremely hostile towards you, it may be
worthwhile to do what you can to appease him.

Under command 15 you have the following options:

A. REQUEST LOAN

Ask to borrow money from another master. Unlike loans from the merchant,
these debts bear no interest. If another master does not have the funds
available to lend you the full amount you request, he may offer you a
smaller loan. If you fail to repay the money or rice, the master from whom
you borrowed will become very hostile, making it difficult to deal with him
in the future. Debts to other masters will not be posted nor repaid
automatically.

B. REPAY LOAN

Though debts to other masters will automatically be repaid in the autumn
this command allows you to pay them back earlier.

				35

C. BORROW RICE

Use this command to borrow rice from other masters. The conditions for
borrowing rice are the same as for other debts.

D. RETURN RICE

Rice borrowed from other masters will be returned automatically in autumn,
but you can return it earlier.

E. EXCHANGE LAND

If one of your states is located adjacent to that of another master, you
may be able to exchange land with him. Should you have several states
isolated from each other the ability to exchange land with other masters
should help you unify territory.

To exchange land with another master both of you must have two states or
more and the states to be exchanged must be adjacent. Note that when you
exchange land the loyalty of people in both states will drop.

F. PROPOSE MARRIAGE

You can offer one of your daughters to another master. If he agrees to
marry her his hostility towards you will drop sharply. However, if you have
attacked him left him with bad debts or done similar things to him in the
past, he may kill both your daughter and your messenger. If so, your
charisma (P.42) as well as your luck (P.43) will decline. If you attack a
state in which your daughter lives as the wife of a master he will kill her
and your charisma and popular loyalty will similarly decline. However, when
a master dies and is succeeded by one of his subordinates, previous
marriage based relationships become irrelevant. A master can have more than
one wife.

G. GIVE GIFT

Giving gifts is one way to lower another master's hostility towards you.
You should bear in mind that if another master's hostility towards you is
less than 10 you are completely safe from attack and if it is zero you can
demand land.

H. MILITARY ALLIANCE

If successful, you can use this command to persuade a master to attack
another third state with you. However, this does not mean he will help you
should you get into trouble.

				36

I. ARMISTICE

After a war has exceeded a month, either master may call for armistice
negotiations.

J. DEMAND LAND

If another master's hostility towards you becomes 0 you can demand land
from him. He will not be able to refuse your request. However, you must
give him 10,000 points of money, a jade seal (P.45) or one of your
daughters. Conversely, if another master's service (P.45) to you reaches
100 he will be able to demand land on the same terms.

COMMAND 16, >TRADE<

You can do business with either a merchant or a weapons maker (P.44).

A. MERCHANT

You may take a loan from a merchant for up to 1,000 units of money. Loans
from the merchant bear interest at the rate posted on the main display.
Your debt will automatically be paid back in autumn (P.47), though you have
the option of paying back sooner. Merchants will also buy and sell rice at
the posted price. Merchants will always be available in states 4, 7, 10,
13, 20, 21, 28, 29, 37, 48, and 56 but in other states they will come and
go. Merchants will tend to avoid states with low popular loyalty and low
land values. Merchants will also tend to avoid southern states in Summer
and northern states in Winter.

B. WEAPONS MAKER

Not surprisingly, weapons makers make weapons to enhance the army's
fighting ability. To have a weapon made you must pay one unit of money and
supply ten units of metal. The weapons makers will make weapons so long as
you have the money and the metal.

COMMAND 17, >AUTHORIZATION<

As the number of states under your control increases, administering each
one individually may become a nuisance. Command 17 allows you to grant
authorization to a general to run his state without direct orders from you.
The general will not only run the state on a day to day basis but will, if
attacked,  handle defense. You should make a policy of only entrusting
states of little

				37

immediate strategic importance. Command 17 can also be used to remove
authorization from a general and personally take control again. You may
want to take advantage of this feature should a shift in events cause a
previously insignificant state to become important, the arrival of a new
neighbor, for example.

Command 17 must be issued from the state the master is in, but it costs no
money and a second command may be given after it.

COMMAND 18, >WANDER<

Command 18 allows you, the master, to simply pack your things in a knapsack
and abandon your state. Wandering is a last resort use fuel if your state
is extremely weak and surrounded on all sides by strong enemies. When you
wander all the generals in states other than yours will leave, generals in
your state may accompany you but will be restricted to 500 soldiers apiece.

You can be forced to wander if you are captured during war by an enemy and
then released or flee from a battle. If you become a wanderer during war,
subordinate generals who fought with you will follow you. However, if you
become a wander after being released by the enemy, no generals will follow
you. 

Since as a wanderer you own no states, a modified version of the main
display will appear. The commands available to you as a wanderer are as
follows:

A. MOVE

Used to move to a neighboring state. Every time you move, a number of
volunteers will gather around you. You may place these men under any of
your generals or command them personally. If the total number of troops in
your army reaches 20,000 men, you will no longer be allowed to wander, you
will be considered to have established a state with yourself as master. If
you are in someone else's state at the time you will have to fight him
first. See chapter 6, War. You run a risk of being captured when you start
to move in an occupied state.

B. SETTLE

Take the state you are in as your own. You automatically settle when as a
wanderer your army reaches 20,000 men but you can also settle by giving
this order. When you are in an empty land, establishing a new state is as
simple as giving this order. If you are in a state already belonging to
another master, 

				38

you will need to fight him. See Chapter 6, War for details.

C. SECLUDE

Seclude yourself without worry that you will be detected. If you are
secluded no volunteers will gather around you.

D. VIEW

Almost identical to the View command on the regular main display. Use this
command to see conditions in other states and check on your subordinates.
You can give another order after using view.

E. STOP GAME

Allows game to be ended and/or saved to disk.

No commands other than the above are available to you as a wander, though
as soon as you establish a new state the full main display with the full
range or orders will return.

COMMAND 19, >PASS<

Give no order to a state that month.

COMMAND 20, >OTHER<

Use >other< to give commands related to game operation but not play itself.

A. INTERRUPT GAME

End and/or save the game. If you wish to stop playing mid game, even if you
have no desire to save the game. Please use Interrupt Game rather than
simply cutting power to the computer. Otherwise you risk damaging your
disks.

B. SOUND ON/OFF

Sound may be turned on or off with the command. You may also control sound
by

				39

using the F1 and F2 keys. When prompted, F1 will turn sound off and F2 will
turn it on.

C. ANIMATION ON/OFF

Animation may be turned on or off with this command. Turning animation off
will in no way affect game play. Animation may also be controlled using the
F3 and F4 key. Where prompted, F3 will turn animation off and F4 will turn
it on.

D. DISPLAY WAIT

You can vary the length of time messages are displayed. The default value
is 6, the maximum value is 10. The greater the number the longer messages
will be displayed.

				40

V. GENERALS

All characters in the game are generals. Generals are mainly defined by
their parameters, position and number of troops. The table below is an
exhaustive list of the characteristics that make up a general. During the
game this information can be obtained using Command 6, >View< (P.30).
Points 14 to 16 are only relevant when the general is a master.

1	STATUS			EMPLOYED, FREE, OR WANDERING
2	POSITION		GOVERNOR, MASTER, OR NONE
3	LOYALTY			BOND OF SOLDIER TO GENERAL OR GENERAL TO
				MASTER
4	AGE			AGE IN YEARS
5	BODY			HEALTH OF A GENERAL
6	INTELL.			INTELLIGENCE
7	POWER			MILITARY ABILITY
8	CHARISMA		LEADERSHIP AND PERSUASIVE ABILITY
9	LUCK			LUCK
10	EXPERIENCE		EXPERIENCE IN WAR. ALL GENERALS START WITH
				NONE BUT MAY ACQUIRE IT.
11	SOLDIERS		NUMBER, LOYALTY AND ABILITY OF SOLDIERS IN
				A GENERALS' ARMY.
12	NAVAL			A GENERAL RATED NAVAL CAN CROSS WATER MORE
				EASILY THAN ONE NOT SO RATED.
13	JADE SEAL		INDICATES THAT A MASTER HAS A JADE SEAL.
14	ANIMOSITY TOWARDS YOU	STRENGTH OF ANOTHER MASTER'S WISH TO HARM
				YOU.
15	SERVICE TO YOU		DEGREE TO WHICH YOU ARE IN ANOTHER MASTER'S
				DEBT FOR FAVORS DONE YOU.
16	YOUR DAUGHTER IS HIS	YOUR DAUGHTER IS WED TO THAT MASTER.
	     WIFE

1. STATUS

A general is either employed, free or wandering. A master who has left his
state or states behind and is roaming the country looking for new territory
is considered to be wandering. Only a master may wander. A general who is
not a

				41

master but works for a master is employed. A general who is not a master
himself but serves no master is free. A free general becomes employed after
being recruited by a master.

2. POSITION

A master can only directly control the state he is actually in. Any state
belonging to a master that the master is not in is controlled by a governor
who accepts orders from the master. This governor is automatically
appointed by the computer from among generals in that state. One master may
not serve another as a governor. Generals who are neither masters nor
governors are considered to have no position.

3. LOYALTY

Loyalty is used to describe the bond between soldiers and their general or
between a general and a master. Soldiers with low loyalty are likely to
betray their commanders on the battlefield. Generals with low loyalty may
betray the master they serve under them. Generals who have been appointed
governor who defect to another master give control of the state they had
been entrusted to the new master.

4. AGE

Life expectancy is largely predetermined, though luck (P.44) and health
affect it. Life expectancy appears nowhere on the screen, though a low
number of body (P.42) points together with advanced age indicates a general
who may be nearing his end.

5. BODY

The number of body points indicates a general's health, with 100 indicating
perfect health and 0 death. The number of body points does not influence
the effectiveness of general's orders, either on the main or battle
display. Plague

				42

will lower a general's health, as will advancing age. New values for body
will be posted every Spring.

6. INTELLIGENCE

The greater a general's intelligence the more likely it is he will be able
to successfully carry out covert missions against the opposition, search
for needed materials, or administer a state well. You can increase a
general's intelligence by giving him books with command 7, >Give< (P.32) so
long as there is another general in the state with two points more of
intelligence. Intelligence may reach a maximum value of 100.

7. POWER

Power is a summary of a general's military abilities, and powerful generals
are far more effective in combat than those who excel in other areas. A
general's power will increase with every victory on the battle display but
will decrease if he is taken hostage. Power may reach a maximum value of
100.

8. CHARISMA

Charisma has great bearing on a general's ability to conduct diplomatic
negotiations and successfully sway other generals over to his side.
Charisma is especially important for masters, who must influence others.
Charisma will decrease when a general plunders or when his daughter is
executed by an enemy. The only way to increase charisma is to accumulate a
great deal of rice and then give virtually all of it to the peasants.
Specifically, more than 5,000 units of rice must be donated with less than
100 left in stock. Charisma may reach a maximum value of 100.

9. LUCK

Luck plays an important part in nearly all game events. The maximum value
for luck is 100.

				43

10. EXPERIENCE

Experience must be acquired, no one starts the game with any. Any time a
general completes a task, be it leading men in battle or merely acting as a
messenger,  his experience level will rise. Experience is easier to
increase than intelligence (P.42) but just as valuable. The maximum value
for experience is 100.

11. SOLDIERS

A general's military power is largely a function of his soldiers. When the
number of soldiers in a general's army is displayed so will be the
soldiers' loyalty to him and the weapons level of the army. This weapons
level is given as a ratio of arms to soldiers. 

Weapons level may be increased by using command 11, >Search< to find metal
and then hiring a weapons maker(command 16)to make weapons. Loyalty of an
army to its general may be raised by giving gold or rice to him (command
7), since he will pass along some of this gift to his troops.

12. NAVAL ABILITY

Some armies are amphibious, others can cross lakes and rivers only with
great difficulty or not at all. An amphibious army will be indicated as
naval. Since many states have waterways running through them naval ability
is greatly advantageous.

The following only apply if the general is a master:

13. JADE SEAL

There will be an indication if a master has a jade seal, considered proof
of princehood. A master with a jade seal is unlikely to be betrayed by
subordinates and should find it easier to recruit generals. However, since
all masters want a jade seal, its possession greatly enhances the risk of
being attacked.

				44

14. ANIMOSITY TOWARDS YOU

A Master's animosity toward you increases when you do unpleasant things
like murder his messengers or daughters, attack states belonging to him,
recruit his generals, get caught burning or attempting to burn his food
supplies and the like.

Animosity will decrease when you do nice things using command 15, 
>Diplomatic Negotiations< (P.35), like giving gifts, making non interest
bearing loans, or presenting daughters for marriage. Hostility ranges from
0 to 100 is an intensely burning hatred of the sort that leads to rash
attacks. 50 is neutral and lower than ten means you can be almost
absolutely sure that he will not attack you. When your opponent's animosity
reaches zero you are entitled to demand a state from him. This is also done
using command 15, >Diplomatic Negotiations<. In exchange for the state you
give him 10, 000 units of money, a jade seal or one of your daughters in
marriage must.

15. SERVICE TO YOU

This indicates how much another master has done for you. Sending gifts, 
daughters or making loans means points. When another master's Service to
You reaches 100, he may demand land. You cannot refuse, but you may decide
which one of your states to give and pull your generals and their troops
out of it before giving. You are also entitled to receive 10, 000 units of
in money, a jade seal or a wife.

16. YOUR DAUGHTER IS HIS WIFE

If one of your daughters is one of another master's wives this will be
indicated. If you attack a state whose master is married to your daughter
it is virtually certain that he will kill her. If he does, your charisma
(P.42) and the loyalty of your people will decline.

				45

VI. EVENTS

During the course of the game the following events will probably occur with
some regularity:

1. SEASONAL EVENTS

A. SPRING

Spring (January to March) is the time when body (P.42) points are posted
and generals in poor health may die. This includes generals involved in
fighting. If during war your commander in chief of sickness, all his
subordinate generals become wanderers.

B. AUTUMN

In Autumn (July to September), taxes are collected, and all generals and
soldiers are paid their salaries. If you don't have the funds to pay them
sufficiently, those generals who are not very loyal to you may leave.

2. NATURAL DISASTERS

As many as five separate disasters may occur at the beginning of each
season. Below are their descriptions:

A. FLOODS

Every summer, floods occur in the Yangtze and Yellow river valleys. Floods
not only decrease the population and number of soldiers (P.44), but also
lower land values and popular loyalty. The only thing you can do is to
invest in flood prevention work, which will lower the probability of flood
and lessen the severity of flood damage should flood occur.

B. PLAGUE

Plague can occur at anytime throughout the year but is especially likely
during

				46

cold winters. Plague decreases the population, the number of soldiers
(P.44) the loyalty of the people and the health (expressed in body (P.42)
points of generals). If peasant loyalty is high the likelihood of plague
(P.47) will decrease.

C. EARTHQUAKES

Earthquakes can occur at any time, in any place and there isn't a thing you
can do about them. Major earthquakes, though rare, are strong enough to
destroy castles, killing the generals within.

D. LOCUSTS

Plagues (P.47) of locust appear during spring (P.47) and autumn (P.47), and
cannot be prevented. Locusts will decrease the population, the number of
soldiers (P.44), land value, popular loyalty and other parameters as well.
They will spread to surrounding areas the next season. In winter locusts
die off, but in spring they cause enormous damage, making them perhaps the
worst disaster of all. If floods and locust occur at the same time, the
locusts will die off before they can do any harm.

E. REVOLT

If the loyalty of the people in your state is low, revolt may occur.
Temporary taxes, plunder or disasters will decrease loyalty so the
possibility of revolt will rise. When revolts occur, the strong generals
will manage to flee the state while the weak ones will be slaughtered by
the people. As the loyalty of the people. As the loyalty of the people
declines towards zero, revolt becomes more likely and the state becomes
more difficult to govern.

				47

VII. WAR

BATTLE DISPLAY

When you are attacked by another state, attack another state or, as a
wanderer, attempt to establish yourself in a state already owned by another
master, the screen will change from the main display to the battle display.

The first thing you need to do is select the generals to fight, appoint a
commander in chief and give the invasion force money and rice. Next place
your generals on the battlefield. When you position a general you are also
positioning his troops. Together a general and his troops are considered a
unit. If you are the attacker you will also need to place your supplies.

PLACING UNITS AND SUPPLIES

The computer will ask you to place each general and then the army's
supplies on the battlefield. You can only position generals and supplies
where there are oval marks on the map. Move units about using either the
keyboard or the key pad as in the diagram below. Pushing a key will move a
unit one hex in the indicated direction. Units will blink until they are
positioned. When you are satisfied with the location of a unit, hit the 0
key to leave it in that place. Units may not be stacked on top of each
other. Supplies, however, must be 

				48

guarded and can share a hex with a friendly unit.

You are only allowed to place a maximum of ten generals on the map at one
time, so if you brought more than that the excess generals will be placed
in reserve. If during the war the number of generals dips to less than ten,
as will happen should one of your units be destroyed, the computer will ask
you if you'd like to call in reinforcements. If you answer in the
affirmative, you will be able to use generals originally selected but not
yet deployed.

CONDITIONS FOR VICTORY

THE ATTACKER HAS WON WHEN:

The enemy side runs out of supplies.
He takes control of every castle on the map.
There are no enemy generals left alive.
He kills the enemy master, or takes him hostage and then release him.

THE DEFENDER HAS WON WHEN:

He steals the enemy's supplies, or when they run out naturally.
He kills the enemy's commander in chief.

1	MOVE		MOVE UNIT
2	ATTACK		ATTACK ENEMY UNITS
3	RETREAT		WHOLE ARMY OR UNITS TRY TO ESCAPE BATTLEFIELD
4	SURRENDER	GENERAL SURRENDERS TO ENEMY
5	STANDBY		DO NOTHING BUT INCREASE MOBILITY FOR NEXT TURN
6	VIEW		VIEW REPORT ON GENERALS AND BATTLE CONDITIONS

				49

			   PICTURE

BATTLE DISPLAY COMMANDS

There are seven different commands that may be given on the battle display,
most with their own sub commands. Following is a brief outline. All of
these commands can be executed by simply entering the appropriate number,
there is no need to hit return.

				50

1. MOVE

The amount and kind of movement a unit is capable of per turn is a function
of unit type, the sort of terrain the unit is on and the number of mobility
points the unit has at any given moment. Most units will have around 6
points of mobility, but mobility will vary with the power (P.43) of the
commanding general, the amount of training the soldiers have received and
the amount of weaponry they are carrying, with heavy weapons being likely
to lower mobility. Mobility will decline by 2 during winter. Application of
command 10, >Train Soldiers< (P.33), on the main display will raise
mobility.

Markers used on the Hex screen.

				51

	There are six kinds of terrain;

	Plains. Requires mobility 2.
	Mountains. Requires mobility 4.
	Swamp. Mobility necessary to move into, 5.
	River, Lake or Sea. Naval forces require mobility 6, non naval
	forces require mobility 10.
	Castle. Requires mobility 3.
	Highly Mountainous Terrain. Completely impassable.

There are four different types of movement.

A. NORMAL

To move normally, enter 1 for Move and then select option 1, Normal move,
from the Move menu. Use the main keyboard of key pad to enter direction in
the same way you did initially when positioning the units. You can continue
to move until a unit runs out of mobility points for that turn. Thus if you
are in plains and have mobility of 10, you can move five steps.

B. SWEAR AND MOVE

You can often provoke an enemy located next to you into following and
trying to overtake you by cursing him and then moving. If the other
commander is less intelligent than your general he will take comments on
his mother and other varied topics quite seriously, giving you a chance to
entrap him or lead him

				52

away from his current position.

C. DIVIDE

Divides a general's troops into two halves so the unit can attack an enemy
from two sides at once. An attack of this sort allows you to inflict severe
casualties on the enemy while keeping your own to a minimum. You must be
next to the enemy you would like to surround before using Divide.

2. ATTACK

A. REGULAR

Your unit attacks an enemy unit, resulting in casualties on both sides. If
the total number of soldiers (P.44) on one side becomes zero the remaining
general will be usually be captured by the enemy, though in some cases a
general may continue to fight alone or be killed.

If you catch an enemy general you must decide whether or not to kill him.
If you kill him he will be dead and out of your way forever. If you let him
live, you have the option of freeing him or enlisting his help as a
subordinate. If you let an enemy general go he will leave the state. If he
is a master he will start wandering, or try to attack you as if nothing
happened. If you make him your subordinate he will become part of your army
like any other general. If he was captured when you were on the offensive
he can be used in the war, but if he was caught when you were on the
defensive he cannot be used in reserve. In any case, captured generals will
not be very loyal. You cannot make another master your subordinate.

B. SIMULTANEOUS ATTACK

In a regular attack soldiers will fight the enemy in tight groups,
minimizing casualties on your side but also the amount of damage they
inflict on the enemy. In a simultaneous attack the entire unit, or as much
of it as possible,  will charge the enemy. Casualties on both sides tend to
be great. The most effective way to use Simultaneous attack is to surround
the enemy first.

C. CHARGE

Just about everyone dies. Your unit will engage the enemy unit in hand to
hand combat until one side loses all its soldiers. In order to charge your
unit

				53

needs to have some mobility. There is also a good chance you will not
capture any of the enemy generals alive. If you are looking for hostages
you might to stay away from this command.

D. TRICK

You can use this command to trap your enemy, but if the general carrying
out the mission is not intelligent, the chances of failure are great. If
your trick succeeds, not only will the number of enemy soldiers in the unit
you attacked decrease, but the enemy's mobility will become 0. The relative
number of soldiers (P.44) in your unit and the enemy unit is nearly
irrelevant. It is nearly impossible to capture an enemy general using this
tactic.

E. INCENDIARY ATTACK

Use this command to set a neighboring area on fire. If you succeed, the
fire will spread and your enemy will be forced to move, retreat or
surrender. The enemy, including the enemy generals, may be completely
destroyed. Fire will spread downwind and burn just about anything in its
path, friend or foe, so you are well advised to check wind direction before
applying this order. You cannot enter a hex where fire is burning.

3. RETREAT

Have a unit retreat to one of your states (P.23) or to an empty state. You
cannot retreat when there is no place adjacent to go. If mobility is poor
or the unit is surrounded by a large number of enemy soldiers retreat may
prove impossible or result in the capture of large number of your generals.
When a general retreats he only takes his unit with him, but when a master
retreats he takes the entire army.

4. SURRENDER

You can order your generals to surrender to the enemy, where they will be
taken as hostage.

				54

5. STANDBY

When a unit stands by it does nothing, but its mobility will be one point
higher next turn.

6. VIEW

View gives you detailed information on your own and opposing generals and
on battle conditions. You can give another order after view.

				55

VIII. WHEN A GENERAL IS CAPTURED

Generals may be captured during war or when they show up in a state owned
by someone else, as they might if wandering, trying to recruit or on a
covert mission. A master can dispose of a captured general in any of the
following ways:

A. BEHEAD 

Waste the malefactor.

B. FREE

If he is an ordinary general he will go about the country as a free
general. If he is a master he will attempt to return to his own country,
becoming a wanderer if he is not able to return. Should a master not be
able to return to his own land the states he once owned will become empty.

C. RECRUIT

If he is not a master he can be made a subordinate. However, generals
caught and then made subordinates needed to be treated with great care
since their loyalty to you will be low while loyalty towards their former
master will remain high. If you, the master, are caught by the enemy you
may be released if your charisma (P.42) is strong and your captor doesn't
harbor any particularly deep hatred towards you. However, the chances of
you being killed are very great. Even if you are lucky enough to be freed,
you will loose all your lands and have to continue the game as a wanderer
if you are unable to return to your state.

				56

IX. WHEN A MASTER DIES

If a master dies, one of his subordinate generals will succeed him. When
the master you selected dies, pick a suitable successor from among his
subordinates. Should no subordinate be available the master's line is
considered extinct and the game over. When a master passes away and is
replaced loyalty towards the new master will be less than it was towards
the old master, though the degree of difference will depend on the new
master. The loyalty of some subordinate generals may become zero. These
generals will go out on their own and become free generals (P.43) rather
than serve the new master.

				57

CHART - RELATIONSHIP BETWEEN MASTER AND SUBORDINATE

WHEN A MASTER IS RULING ONE OR MORE STATES

			Master

Governor				Generals in the same state as
					the master
		Master's own troops

Governor's troops			General's troops

Generals serving governor

Troops of generals serving governor


WHEN A MASTER IS WANDERING

				Master

					Generals accompanying the master

					Troops accompanying the generals

Troops directly serving the master

				58

X. HINTS

Romance of The Three Kingdoms is not difficult, but the sheer number of
commands can make it intimidating at first. Below are some general
suggestions. Start by picking a strong master in a strong situation. You
might want to start with Cao Cao in scenario three, for example. Look at
your state and see what problems it has. If the probability of flood (P.47)
is high do some flood prevention work in the three months before summer.
However, don't break yourself doing it. Spending more than three or four
units of money on flood control at a time is not cost effective. Next, give
some rice to the peasants in order to raise their loyalty if its low. After
that develop new fields to raise land value. In fall, when you have a
little more money, purchase supplies from the merchant. If the merchant is
not available, cultivate more to raise your country's land value. Even
though other masters may quickly go to war, raising land value is the first
task you should undertake.

You may have noticed that you have an advisor. He is appointed
automatically from among highly intelligent generals. If you have no
advisor you should try and recruit a general of high intelligence (P.43),
who will then serve as one. Though the advisor is not always right you
should generally listen to what he says. The higher his intelligence (P.42)
the better his advise.

After putting your own house in order, start thinking about expansion. Use
view to check on the states (P.23) surrounding you. If you can find one
with less than 100 units of rice and money it should be easy for you to
take it, assuming of course you are better off. Your ideal target will have
a large population (above 100,000) since a large population means you can
easily increase productivity and recruit soldiers.

If there is a state significantly more powerful than you on one of your
borders send gifts to that country through Diplomatic negotiations to
reduce the master's hostility. You can also use Diplomatic negotiations to
trick two strong states (P.23) into fighting and destroying each other.

When you attack another state it's difficult to know what the terrain is
going to be like, so try to come in with twice as many soldiers as the
enemy has, or slightly more soldiers and much better generals. When
fighting on the hexagonal map try to concentrate all your generals on one
target, preferably the master if he is there. Captured generals should be
taken on as subordinates but put them in less important positions.

				59

When attacking do not use Charge unless you are low on supplies and need to
finish the war quickly. Charge will produce many casualties among your
troops,  but you will capture few if any enemy generals. However, if you
are running low on supplies and need to wipe out the enemy quickly, this
may be an acceptable price to pay.

War however, is not the only means of expanding your territory. One of the
best ways to expand is to find an enemy governor with low loyalty and
Recruit him. Don't forget you can use Covert action to lower the loyalty of
a governor. Another diplomatic option is to reduce a master's hostility
towards you to zero by sending gifts and doing favors. When hostility
towards you reaches zero, you have the right to demand land, though you
will have to pay for it.

As you conquer states, you will find yourself with new subordinate
generals. Look at these generals closely. Generals with a loyalty of less
than 50 are nearly useless, but loyalty can be raised with Gifts. As you
expand be sure to use your generals effectively. Send the strong ones to
fight, the intelligent ones to less developed states to enhance
productivity and use those with high intelligence as messengers during
diplomatic negotiations. Well rounded and highly loyal generals with no
particularly distinctive characteristics can always be used as autonomous
governors in less strategically important states.

				60

XI. END GAME

In order to end a game in progress from the main menu, enter command 20, 
>Other< (P.39) and select interrupt. If wandering, select 5, >Stop Game<.
If you want to save the game so that you can resume play at some other time
select answer "Yes" when asked "Save game to disk". Please do not simply
remove your disks since the risk of damaging them is real.

If you ran the program under Koei's operating system, as would be the case
if you booted your machine from the A game disk, it will be necessary to
reset your machine after a game has been terminated and before running
other software. If you are playing from a hard disk you will be returned to
the operating system once the game is over.

IN CASE OF DIFFICULTY

In case of difficulty with this produce please contact Koei Corporation.
The address is:

	Koei Corporation
	20, 000 Mariner Avenue
	Suite 100
	Torrance, CA  90503
	ATTN: User Support

Our phone number is (213)542-6444. Business hours are 9:00 AM to 5:00 PM
Pacific time, monday through friday.

This product has been produced using Microsoft C Compiler from Microsoft
Corporation and PLINK86 plus from Phoenix Technologies Ltd.

				61

APPENDIX - PRONOUNCING NAMES

There is a basic problem putting Chinese names into English. The two
languages use a fundamentally different kind of pronunciation. English is a
stress accented language while Chinese is pitch accented. In English the
word "faclity" is pronounced by stressing the "fa" sound more heavily than
the rest of the word. Try saying "facility" with stress on "cility" and the
result is unintelligible even though the component parts of the word are
being pronounced correctly.

Chinese uses tone rather than stress. The words for "buy" and "sell", for
example, are identical except for changes in voice tone (pitch) when
pronounced. There are systems for writing these changes in tone using
regular Roman characters and accent marks but they require a great deal of
training to use properly.

In producing Romance of The Three Kingdoms, Koei has compromised, using a
system called Pin Yin but no diacritical marks. Chinese speakers should be
able to reconstitute names as they appear in the game into Chinese with
little problem but non Chinese speakers have been spared strange squiggles
and, at least as much as possible, completely counter intuitive spellings.

Please use the following as a guide:

Xi should be pronounced as Shi
Xu should be pronounced as Shu
Si and Qi should be pronounced as Chi
Zhu should be pronounced between Zoo and Jew
An at the end of a word should be pronounced En
Ang at the end of a word should be pronounced An
C should be pronounced as Ch

For example, when saying Master Cao Cao's name pretend you're saying
"good-by" in Hollywood Italian twice, "Cao Cao". When saying the name of
master Liu Yan first pronounce Li and U separately so you say Lee Ooh. Then
pronounce Yan like the Japanese currency-Yen.

				62

 		  ROMANCE OF THE THREE KINGDOMS

		  HISTORICAL NOTES & REFERENCES

				63

			(THIS PAGE IS BLANK)

				64

INTRODUCTION

Koei's Romance of The Three Kingdoms is based closely on a Chinese
historical novel of the same name written by Lo Kunachung sometime in the
fourteenth century. It is by no means necessary to have read the novel to
enjoy the game, but a passing familiarity with some of the characters and
general premises may might make the game more exciting. This introduction
and the following chapters provide just such a cursory introduction to the
novel. 

Those wishing to pursue the novel in its original version may wish to pick
up C. H. Brewitt Taylor's English language translation, published by
Charles E. Tuttle and Company under the title Romance of The Three
Kingdoms. Any large library should have it, and most well stocked book
stores will have it or be able to order it. For those interested, Chinese
language versions are available under the title San Kuo Chih Yen-I while
Japanese language versions of the novel are available under the title San
Goku Shi.

Romance of The Three Kingdoms is a somewhat fictionalized account of the
120 years of Chinese history that stretches from the fall of the strong and
centralized government of the Later Han Dynasty in A.D. 168 to China's
division into three separate kingdoms, Wei, Shu and Wu, and eventual
reunification under the first Chin Emperor in A.D. 265.

In China there were two Han dynasties. The first, called the Early Han,
fell in A.D.8 after more than two hundred years of successful government.
Many factors contributed to the collapse but the most important was
continued infighting among consort families, nobles close to the emperor
and his court. In A.D. 25 the second Han, a continuation of the first,
appeared. This restored dynasty is now referred to as the Later Han. In an
attempt to avoid repeating mistakes of the past, measures were taken to
control the power of consort families. However, these measures brought a
new weakness into the system. In order to hold the power of consort
families in check, a rigid etiquette was developed. The Emperor was kept
secluded:he did not leave his palace and had virtually no direct contact
with anyone on the outside, including his own ministers. However, the
ladies of the palace and the eunuchs who attended them, 

				65

the only "males" allowed to reside in the palace, were in constant contact
with the emperor. It was through them that he learned news of the outside
and heard opinions. Soon the eunuchs started shaping this information to
suite their own ends.

Firmly established in the center of government, eunuchs took complete
control of the civil service, selling titles and power for gold. To the
scholar class, who thought of the civil service as their own and positions
something to be earned by success on competitive examinations, this came as
a blow.

Military provincial officials found that they were only able to keep their
positions with costly gifts to the eunuchs, and that in turn meant
subjecting the general population to horrible pressure. Taxes were
unreasonably high and large amounts of labor were demanded by the
government. Popular revolts were not uncommon and hatred of the eunuchs by
officials grew as incompetents were promoted by reason of payment and good
officers were degraded for unwillingness or inability to do the same.

For many years the central provinces of China had been swept by an epidemic
for which an itinerant magician by the name of Chang Chueh discovered a
cure. Whether Chang had some medical skill, or the epidemic was susceptible
to faith healing is not clear. In any case, before long Chang had an army
of faithful followers convinced that they owed their lives to him and his
magic. In A.D. 184 Chang decided to exploit his success by taking up arms
against the eunuch dominated government.

Thus began the Yellow Turban Rebellion, so called because of the headdress
which Chang's followers wore, and with the Yellow Turban Rebellion Romance
of The Three Kingdoms opens.

The government, with its military and civil service rotted from within,
found itself largely relying on soldiers of fortune to squash the
rebellion. However, once the rebellion was crushed many of these soldiers
of fortune went on to seize power for themselves, which further
precipitated the downfall of the Latter Han dynasty. Of these soldiers of
fortune one of the most shrewd and successful was a general named Cao Cao
(P.81). After eliminating Tung Cho, Lu Po,  Yuan Shao (P.85), Yuan Shu
(P.85) and a host of other rival generals, he ruled North China as the King
of Wei, persecuting the remaining members of the Latter Han.

Another general, a man by the name of Liu Bei (P.84), rose to fame during
the rebellion and in time came to rule over Szechwan as the King of Shu.
Liu Bei had sworn brotherhood to two men of legendary power, Guan Yu (P.78)
and Zhang Fei (P.83), in what was know as the "peach garden oath". However,
his greatest asset was his advisor, Zhu Ge Liang (P.80).

				66

Liu Bei was, however, relatively weak. The main obstacle keeping ever
territory hungry Cao Cao from controlling all of China was a general named
Sun Qian. Sun Qian had inherited from his farther and older brother the
rich kingdom of Wu,  south of the Yangtze river. When Cao Cao felt ready to
cross the Yangtze take the kingdom of Wu, Sun Qian and Liu Bei formed an
alliance, and the combined efforts of their military commanders, Zhou Yu
(P.79) and Zhu Ge Liang, proved sufficient to crush Cao Cao's forces and
halt his advance. After this victory Liu Bei established himself in
Szechwan, ruling as the King of Shu. With Cao Cao in Wei and Sun Quan
(P.82) in Wu the precarious three way balance of power that gave the era
its name was born.

The alliance between the kingdoms of Shu and Wu did not last long. Guan Yu,
one of Liu Bei's generals, antagonized Sun Quan and was killed in an armed
struggle. Liu Bei vowed to conquer Wu, against the advice of Zhu Ge Liang,
who wanted to improve relations with Wu and invade the common enemy of Wei.
Liu Bei led a personal expedition against Wu and suffered a disastrous
defeat, dying soon afterwards.

Liu Bei was succeeded by his son, a moronic weakling. However, out of
loyalty to Liu Bei, Zhu Ge Liang decided to serve him and try to improve
the Shu kingdom's fortunes. He managed to make peace with the kingdom of Wu
and led several expeditions against Wei. However, Zhu Ge was overwhelmed
with work and handicapped by a lack of able subordinate generals, so these
campaigns all ended in stalemates. Compounding matters was the fact that
the Wei commander Sima Yi (P.79), whose family had become increasingly
powerful in the Wei court, was Zhu Ge's tactical equal, or close. Finally,
Zhu Ge Liang died of physical exhaustion. By the time that Zhu Ge died the
Sima clan had usurped much of the power of Wei and subjected Cao Cao's
descendants to as much cruelly as Cao Cao had subjected the Han emperors.
Wu and Shu were both weak, leaving them vulnerable to the Wei kingdom. Wei
invaded Shu and even though Jiang Wei (P.89), the commanding Shu general,
did everything he could, he was overwhelmed by the numerical strength of
the invading Wei force. Based on the success of that final attack, Suma
Yen, Suma I's grandson, came to rule China as the first Chin emperor and
the Three Kingdoms period came to an end.

				67

PLOT SUMMARY

Romance of The Three Kingdoms opens with a scene in which Liu Bei (P.84),
Guan Yu (P.78) and Zhang Fei (P.83) swear an oath of brotherhood under
fully blossoming peach flowers. Liu Bei is to be eldest brother, but all
three promise to act with their minds united as one and ties closer than
those of blood. "We were not born on the same day but we seek to die
together," they said.

				(PICTURE)

It was the end of the Second Century and China's second Han Dynasty was
about to collapse. The palace was tearing itself apart with a power
struggle and peasants, suffering from natural disasters and continued
merciless government,  were at the edge of rebellion.

While this was going on, Chang Chueh, an itinerant magician who called
himself "Father of the Way of Peace" tried to take over the country with
the support of a peasant cult that worshiped him. The rebels bound theirs
heads with yellow turbans, and thus were called the Yellow Turban Rebels.
The rebellion expanded as far as Loyang, the capital, causing even greater
strife in the palace.

The Emperor then issued an edict that called for everybody to fight against
the rebels. Accordingly, a great number of powerful and aspiring men from
many 

				68

regions gathered to fight against the rebellion. Among them were Cao Cao
(P.81), an unscrupulously resourceful man later to found the Wei Kingdom;
The cruel Dong Zhuo (P.96), who came from a remote region; Lu Pu, who
became Zhuo's right hand man; and Liu Bei who was later to found the Shu
Kingdom.

Taking advantage of the confusion, Dong Zhuo seized power in the capital of
Loyang. He set up an emperor he could influence and took complete control
of civil government. Because of Dong's great power, Cao Cao and another
general named Yuan Shao (P.85) fled loyang and sought shelter elsewhere.
Later, the two allied for the purpose of overthrowing Dong Zhuo. Realizing
that there was danger around him, Dong transferred the capital to Ch'angan.
He also burned Loyang to the ground when leaving it for good measure.

Once in Ch'angan, Dong Zhuo grew even crueler and more ambitious. However,
Wang Yun, a senior civil servant, decided to stop Dong. Realizing that he
could not attack directly, Wang used his daughter as bait to create a
triangular love affair involving Dong and his loyal lieutenant Lu Bu
(P.84). The scheme worked brilliantly. The two fought and Dong was killed
by Lu. However, with Dong dead what central government there was fell apart
and generals in every region of the country began doing what they could to
extend their own power.

Among these generals was Cao Cao. Because of both his ruthlessness and
intelligence, he was known as "a capable man in an orderly world but a
dangerous man a chaotic world" and as "a hero in a chaotic world but a
cunning and dangerous man in a peaceful world".

Another was Liu Bei, a distant descendent of the royal family of the Han
dynasty and founder of the Shu Kingdom. His father died young and Liu Bei
made his living by selling straw sandals and weaving grass mats. Upon the
outbreak of the Yellow Turban Rebellion, he saw an opportunity to
distinguish himself and set out to bread up the rebels. After several
victories he was promoted to magistrate of a small district, but was
dismissed after only a few months. Liu Bei then sought refuge with his
friend, Gong Sun Zan (P.90). Subsequently, he wandered from place to place.

After Dong's death, the group that had banded together against him broke
up, with each member going his separate way. Lu Bu steadily strengthened
his power. Cao Cao, Gong Sun Zan and Yuan Shao began to lay separate plans,
but with the same goal control of the entire country. Yuan Shao drove Gong
Sun Zan to suicide. Cao Cao seized control of Yenchou and planned to strike
Cao Zhen of Hsuchou,  were Liu Bei happened to be sheltered.

				69

Liu Bei fought against Cao Cao under Cao Zhen. Cao Zhen had left a will
decreeing that, should he be killed in battle, Liu Bei would be the one to
take over Hsuchou. Cao Cao's advance was stopped but Cao Zhen was killed
and Liu Bei agreed to take over. Later, Lu Bu, who had just been defeated
by Cao Cao, came to seek shelter with Liu Bei. Liu Bei did not fully trust
the treacherous Lu Bu,  but neither was he sufficiently on his guard. He
was attacked by Lu and forced to seek shelter with his former enemy, Cao
Cao. Lu Bu took control of Hsuchou, taking Liu Bei's wife and children
hostage. Cao Cao decided to give Liu Bei governorship of Yuchou, rejecting
his officers' advice to kill him. He explained that "Liu Bei is too great a
hero to be killed. If I kill him, people in this area will lose faith in
me". Instead, he attacked Hsuchou and killed Lu Pu.

From then on, Cao Cao continued to gain power while the Emperor grew
continually more distraught over the situation. The Emperor secretly
ordered a general named Dong Jiang to murder Cao Cao. Dong Jiang put
together a seven member team for the job. Liu Bei, whose life had taken
several strange and sudden turns by this point, was among those who agreed
to participate.

In 99 A.D., Cao Cao, feeling the time was right to kill Liu Bei, led an
army to Kuantu. Liu Bei's troops were too weak to put up an effective fight
and Guan Yu and Liu Bei's wife were forced to surrendered to Cao Cao. Liu
Bei himself escaped.

Cao Cao admired Guan Yu as a person. Instead of holding him for ransom or
torturing him to death, Cao Cao treated him with courtesy, hoping that Guan
Yu would serve him. Guan Yu showed his gratitude by scoring a major victory
for Cao Cao at the battle of Paima. After the battle Guan Yu went back to
Liu Bei, to whom he felt an overriding loyalty, leaving a polite farewell
letter for Cao Cao.

The Battle of Kuantu was waged between Yuan Shao of the north and Cao Cao.
The battle lasted for six months and might have continued longer had not
Yuan Shao been betrayed by one of his officers. Acting on information he
had obtained from Yuan Shao's advisor, Cao Cao was able to defeat Yuan with
a relatively small force. By winning the war against this stronger army,
Cao Cao obtained a chance to unify the north.

Liu Bei, who had been among Yuan Shao's allies and supporters, realized
that he was in an extremely dangerous position and turned to Liu Biao
(P.101) of Chingchou for shelter. At Chingchou, Liu Bei was treated as an
honored guest, and led a peaceful life for seven years. However, he also
became depressed for want of a goal in life. His thighs grew fat since he
didn't ride a horse. In China today the phrase "grief over fat thighs" has
come to mean depression from lack of activity.

				70

It was during this time of grief that the most significant event in Liu
Bei's life took place. He learned the famous general Zhu Ge Liang's (P.80)
whereabouts, and decided to ask him to serve as commander in chief of an
army. As a friend of Zhu Ge's put it: "There is no one who understands the
conditions in the country as well as Zhu Ge Liang." This knowledge gave Zhu
Ge the potential to wield a great deal of power. For this reason Zhu Ge was
called the Sleeping Dragon or the Lurking Dragon.

Zhu Ge Liang, however, was not the sort of man to undertake a task easily.
Although Liu Bei visited Zhu Ge's house twice, he was sent away each time
on the pretext that Zhu Ge was traveling. On the third visit Liu Bei spoke
with Zhu Ge Liang. After Liu Bei explained his request Zhu Ge Liang agreed
to serve as commander in chief. The phrase "Liu Bei's three visits" are
used in China today when someone obtains a favor from a senior using a
combination of politeness and persistence. Liu Bei said to Zhu Ge Liang:"The
Han dynasty is falling apart. I wish to restore order but am weak, ignorant
and do not know what to do. Only you, master, can lead me from darkness.
How happy I would be if you would do so!" Zhu Ge Liang replied:"Ever since
the Yellow Turban Rebellion one bold man after another has arisen. Cao Cao
was not as powerful as Yuan Shao, but Cao Cao triumphed by finding openings
and then using his resources effectively to exploit them. Now he is all
powerful. He controls an immense army and through his control of the court,
the various feudal lords as well. You have not the resources to even think
of opposing him. The Suns have held their territory in Chiangtun for three
generations. Make an alliance with Sun Jian(P.94). Since many are eager to
get their hands on it, Chingchou should be taken first and used as a home
base. I have studied the stars and know that Liu Biao, master of Chingchou,
is going to die soon. After you have captured Chingchou take control of
Ichou. Lead an expedition to the capital, there the people will give you a
warm welcome. The Han dynasty will be restored once you have firmly
established yourself in the capital and are in a position to control the
entire empire". Zhu Ge Liang's plan to control the empire was later called
the "plan to divide the empire into three parts." Liu Bei placed the utmost
trust in Zhu Ge, which brought some complaints from Guan Yu and Zhang Fei,
who felt relegated to second place. Liu Bei explained it saying "Zhu Ge is
to me as a fish is to water". By this he meant a naturally perfect fit.

At that time it was Cao Cao who had power in the capital. In order to
attack Liu Biao and Liu Bei in the South, he raised an army. Liu Bei was
living at Hsiangjang, unaware of Cao Cao's entry to the area.

Cao Cao invaded the South and Liu Biao died of an illness shortly
afterwards.

				71

Knowing that he could not resist, Liu Bei together with his oldest son Liu
Cong decided to flee. However, they brought with them 100, 000 peasants,
with the idea of saving them from Cao Cao. In order to transport these
people, Liu Bei ordered Guan Yu to prepare several hundred ships and meet
him at Chiangling. When some of military advisors suggested that from a
tactical point of view his behavior was foolish, Liu Bei said:"In order to
complete my great task of unification of the country I will need a great
deal of popular support. I cannot abandon these people". Liu Bei was the
sort of person who often sought virtue but was also capable of great lapses
of responsibility. Liu Bei did take a real risk in saving the peasants, but
when he found himself being overtaken by the enemy army he abandoned his
own wife and son.

Cao Cao's army did eventually catch up with Liu Bei's troops at Ch'angan.
There Zhang Fei managed to hold off Cao Cao's army at a bridge with just 20
men. Liu Bei barely escaped and his wife and son were only saved by Zhao
Yun's (P.82) bravery.

Lu Bei's defeat was followed by an encounter with Lu Su (P.102), a
messenger sent by Sun Jian, who sought an alliance with Liu Bei. Lu Bei
then reciprocated by sending Zhu Ge Liang to Sun Jian. Zhu Ge Liang talked
with Sun's tacticians, saying that "Although defeated, Liu Bei still has
Guan Yu, a legion of veterans and a naval force. Cao Cao's army is far from
home and the men are worn out. The army can do no more. Now if you,
General, will assist Liu Bei, Cao Cao can certainly be damaged and forced
to retreat northward. Then you will be strong and firmly established at Wu,
while Liu Bei will occupy Shu. The country will thus be broken into three
pieces".

With this exchange began preparations for the war between Sun Jian and Cao
Cao. Cao Cao's army was stationed along the Yangtze River. Led by Zhou Yu,
Sun Jian's army was assisted by Liu Bei's troops. The two forces met at Red
Wall. Cao Cao had a total force of 800,000 men, while the allied forces of
Liu Bei and Sun Jian were only 30,000 strong. However, Sun Jian controlled
a port city, which had a superior navy.

It was November 208 A.D. Cao Cao's army took up position on the north side
of the Yangtze river, while the allied forces took the south. Sun Jian's
commander,  Zhou Yu, thought the best way to defeat Cao Cao would be an
incendiary attack. In order to convince Cao Cao that he need not fear such
an attack, Zhou Yu had an old general suggest just an attack in front of
men known to be spies for Cao Cao. He then had the general whipped for
recklessly suggesting an unworkable plan.

For Cao Cao, the area was the only part of the empire left to be conquered.
About 30 years before, he had opened a new era in war torn China by calling
for men to fight against Dong Zhuo. Now it was Liu Bei and Sun Quan (P.*>*)
(son of

				72

Sun Jian) who were confronting Cao Cao. Cao Cao had spent months and years
in battle to attain control of the country, and now the end was in sight.
He reflected on old memories. If only the allied force could be beaten, the
country would be all his.

A number of Cao Cao's generals were worried by the fact that Zhu Ge Liang
was assisting Zhou Yu. It was then that a general named Pang Tong (P.98)
but known as the "Phoenix Fledgling" came to visit Cao Cao. "Phoenix
Fledgling" was one of the most intelligent men in the country, often
compared with Zhu Ge Liang. Cao Cao was planning a water borne attack. The
"Phoenix Fledgling" suggested that Cao Cao link ships together with iron
chains so the ships could easily navigate the violent waves and winds of
the river. Cao Cao liked the idea. When warned by advisors that "Phoenix
might be in conspiracy with Zhu Ge Liang", Cao Cao replied that "Anyone
using fire depends upon the wind. This is now winter and only west winds
blow. There will be neither easterly nor southerly winds. I am on the north
west and the enemy is on the south bank. If they use fire they will destroy
themselves. I have nothing to fear". As for the allies, they were waiting
for favorable winds to carry out their incendiary attack.

				(PICTURE)

"Without favorable winds, the fire scheme will be like a rice cake written
on the wall" said all the allied generals. Thus Zhu Ge Liang proposed that
Zhou Yu "Call the winds and summon the rains". Five hundred men built an
altar at which he prayed. The winds started to change direction, and a full
force south east wind began to blow. Pretending to surrender, an allied
ship was allowed to approach Cao Cao's command vessel. It then set Cao
Cao's ship on fire. All Cao

				73

Cao's other ships, attached to one another as they were burned and sank.
The whole of the Yangtze River was veiled in flames. In the midst of the
fire, Cao Cao escaped.

After the Battle of Red Wall, Liu Bei's power steadily grew. The clever Sun
Quan induced him to marry his sister, hoping to gain politically by the
match. Zhou Yu warned Sun Quan, saying "Feeding Liu Bei would be like
raising a tiger cub as a pet". However, Zhou Yu fell ill and died, and the
marriage never took place. The Shu district had been rich since ancient
times and Liu Bei wanted to make it his own. However, three years after the
Battle of Red Wall, Cao Cao was eyeing the same land. The Phoenix advised
Liu Bei to take control of the Shu area immediately, even if it meant
taking drastic action. Liu Bei raised an army to take the area and put the
Phoenix in charge of it. Three years after his invasion, Liu Bei finally
obtained control over Shu and the precarious balance of the Three Kingdoms
was established.

Fighting between the three kingdoms Cao Cao's Wei, Sun Quan's Wu and Liu
Bei Shu continued without truce. At Chingchou, Guan Yu fought for Liu Bei
against Sun Quan, while at Hanchung, Liu Bei and Cao Cao both claimed the
right to govern the district.

At that time, Cao Cao conquered Hanchung. Liu Bei had earlier won the
battles of Chingchou and Hanchung, but Cao Cao took them both back again.
However, he eventually retreated from Hanchung, saying "It is a pity to
discard drumsticks (Hanchung), but they are not worth eating". Therefore,
Liu Bei came to rule Hanchung.

In the meantime, Guan Yu surrounded Fanch'eng, part of the Wei Kingdom,
forcing Cao Cao to send a supporting army. Guan Yu caused Cao Cao a great
deal of anxiety with gorilla attacks on the area. Suma I therefore advised
Cao Cao to ally with Sun Quan. He suggested that Cao Cao leave control of
the area south of the Yangtze river to Sun and attack Guan from the rear.
Cao Cao followed his advice and formed a secret alliance with Sun Quan, his
enemy since the Battle of Red Wall. They plotted together to attack Gun Yu
from both sides.

Guan Yu had no idea what was going on behind his back. After being invaded
he tried to escape to Shu, but was captured by Sun Quan's army and,
together with his oldest son Guan Ping(P.88), executed. His head was sent
to Cao Cao, who prepared sacrifices and performed rites for the honored
dead.

On New Year's day in 220 A.D., Cao Cao died in Loyang at the age of 66. His
eldest son, Cao Pi (P.93), succeeded him and was able to mount the throne.
His first action was to change the name of the reign to Huang-Chu.

At that time Liu Bei was beset by a number of problems, not the least of
which

				74

was Cai Pi's assent to the throne. Zhu Ge Liang and other subordinates
expressed their hopes that Liu Bei would become emperor in order to prolong
the Han line. Upon hearing this, Liu Bei succeeded the late Han emperor and
changed the name of the reign to Wu-Yuan.

Li Bei's hatred of Sun Quan for killing Guan Yu never dissipated. Despite
the opposition of subordinates who warned him not to attack Wu, Liu Bei
raised an army to seek revenge. The decision stemmed from emotion, not
military wisdom.

				(PICTURE)

In the beginning of the battle, Liu Bei's army moved swiftly toward the Wu
district. However, they were soon too exhausted to fight and many supplies
were lost. The dead bodies of Liu Bei's troops were so numerous they almost
damned up the Yangtze river. Liu Bei, meanwhile, escaped to Paitich'eng. At
Paitich'eng, an ailing Liu Bei, realizing he was nearing death, summoned
Zhu Ge Liang from Ch'engtu to hear his will. He said to Zhu Ge:"The
attainment of emperorship is now in your hands. You must safeguard the
kingdom and complete the great work. If my son Liu Chan(P.101)can be
helped, help him. But if he proves to be a fool then take the throne
yourself". Zhu Ge replied:"I could never do otherwise than wear myself to
the bone in the service of your son, whom I will serve till death". Liu Bei
then said to his sons, "After my death you are to treat the prime
minister(Zhu Ge Liang)as you would your father and be not remiss, for
thereby you will fulfill your father's hopes". On April, 223 A.D., Liu Bei
died at the age of 63.

In May, 17 year old Liu Chan succeeded his father. He was not a bad man,
but one of only ordinary capabilities. He left state affairs to Zhu Ge
Liang, who placed a great burden on himself. In an attempt to fulfill his
master's last wish, Zhu

				75

Ge frantically dealt with state problems. He re-established friendly ties
between Wu and Shu, while subduing riots in the south. In and out of the
state he restored order.

In the Wei Kingdom, Cao Bei died and was succeeded by his son, Cao Jui, who
was named Emperor Wen. Meanwhile, political instability prevailed
throughout the Wei district. Wu took advantage of this and started to
invade Wei. Zhu Ge Liang also saw that this was a good chance. Both the Wu
and Shu kingdoms were ready to attack Wei from both sides:Wu from the east
and Shu from the west. In 227 A.D. Zhu Ge Liang decided to personally lead
the army to battle, placing government at home in Liu Chan's hands. Before
departing, however, he presented a commemorative speech on the expedition:
"The late emperor accomplished but half of his great task before his death.
At this moment the empire is in three parts, and our country is weak. This
is a critical moment for us. Still, ministers are not remiss in the capital,
and loyal and devoted soldiers sacrifice their lives abroad, for they still
remember the special kindness of the late emperor and wish to show their
gratitude to him by service to your majesty. Therefore it would be indeed
fitting that you should extend you holy virtue to glorify his memory by
stimulating the will of your officers. Your majesty should not lose himself
in the pursuit of mean things, quoting phrases to confound the eternal
principles of rectitude and so preventing remonstrance from honest men..."

In the Wei, the whole city was thrown into turmoil. Cai Jui, however,
maintained serenity. His army met Zhu Ge Liang's in full force, prepared
for victory. Zhu Ge Liang placed Ma Sun (P.97) in charge of an important
operation. Ma Su took a crushing loss, in large part because he did not
follow Zhu Ge Liang's orders closely enough. Due to this mistake, the Shu
army found itself unable to advance.

Zhu Ge Liang therefore ordered Ma Su's execution as a gesture of apology to
the soldiers. He explained that "Even if a devoted man commits only one
mistake, discipline must be maintained. Fairness is the value that is
needed most in true leadership."

Zhu Ge then presented a second plan to attack Wei. First, so as not have
another mistake like Ma Su's the entire army was put through training
designed to increase discipline. The heart of the plan was to strike first,
hit hard and win a quick victory. By contrast, the Wei commander Suma I
intended to fight a long war, slowly bleeding the enemy until it was too
exhausted to fight. Zhu Ge was warned by his doctors not to travel a long
way for battle, but personally led his army anyway. His enthusiasm and pace
were such that it seemed that "he would slow only when dead."

				76

It was in 234 A.D. at Wuchang Plain that the battle of the century began, a
contest of clever tricks and careful strategy. When the Shu army struck,
the Wei troops retreated, and when Zhu Ge struck Suma I retreated.
Eventually the battle came to a stalemate and Zhu Ge fell ill. In August
Zhu Ge Liang died at the age of 54.

After the death of its commander, the Shu army secretly began to withdraw.
Suma I followed the retreating army, but was unsure of Zhu Ge Liang's
death. Zhu Ge realized that once he was dead Suma would not hesitate to
make a full attack, so as a last order had a wooden model of himself made.
Suma saw this model and,  believing that Zhu Ge was still alive, fled the
battlefield.

Zhu Ge Liang was a man of great intelligence, but he failed to carry out
his master's last request to restore the Han line and return to the capital
city of Loyang. Suma I, on the other hand, seized all power in the Wei
government and his grandson established the Chin Dynasty, unifying the
empire and ending Romance of the Three Kingdoms.

				77

CHARACTERS

1. GUAN YU - 

Guan Yu was large framed and more than six and a half feet tall. Known both
as one of the five most powerful leaders of the Shu Kingdom and for his
long bear, he was often referred to as "The Duke with the Beautiful Beard."
When Liu Bei(P.84)raised an army to oppose the Yellow Turban Rebellion, he
swore an oath of brotherhood with Guan Yu and Zhang Fei (P.83). All three
scrupulously honored the oath and were as devoted to each other as real
brothers.

Guan Yu was known for his high loyalty. When taken hostage by Cao Cao
(P.81) of the Wei Kingdom, he was offered a chance to become Cao Cao's
subordinate but refused. Instead, he bought his freedom with a small
favor to Cao Cao and returned to Liu Bei. He was, however, later killed
together with his oldest son when a base he had been placed in charge of
was attacked by Cao Cao and Sun Quan (P.82) of the Wu Kingdom.

In life Guan Yu was respected as a general dedicated to the arts of both
pen and sword. In many regions of China today, people worship him as a god.
There are also two temples dedicated to his memory in Japan, one in Kobe
and the other in Yokohama.

2. HUANG ZHONG 

A subordinate of a master called Liu Biao (P.101), who owned a district
named Chingchou, Huang Zhong was placed in charge of a district called
Changsha. However, when attacked by Liu Bei's (P.84) army during the Battle
of Red Wall, he willingly surrendered in order to serve Liu Bei. Latter,
during a fight with Guan Yu (P.78), Huang's horse broke his leg and Huang
was thrown. Guan Yu, however, allowed Huang to fetch a new horse and resume
the fight.

After that Huang Zhong decided to serve Guan Yu's master, Liu Bei. He won
many battles under Liu Bei and played a major role in Liu Bei's attack on
the Shu kingdom. He personally defeated Xia Hou Yuan (P.87), one of Cao
Cao's (P.81) best generals. Sometimes known as "the old general", Huang
Zhong's name is now used

				78

in China when referring an old man with great spirit.

3. SIMA YI

Sima Yi laid the foundation for the Chin Dynasty by serving four
generations of the Wei kingdom: Cao Cao (P.81), Cao Pi (P.93), Cao Zhi, and
Cao Fang. He was succeeded by his son Sima Zhao, and grandson Sima Yen, who
established the Chin Dynasty. He first served Cao Cao as part of the civil
service but was appointed to the military rank of general when it became
apparent that he had an unusual flare for tactics.

In Romance of The Three Kingdoms, Sima Yi appears as a somewhat timid
counterpart to general Zhu Ge Liang (P.80) of the Shu kingdom. On one
occasion, Sima had his troops carry out a delaying action against the army
of the Shu Kingdom knowing that the Shu army was running out of supplies
and that Zhu Ge Liang, its commander, was nearing death. It was a good idea
but Zhu Ge, realizing Sima's weakness, had a wooden model of himself made
shortly before his death. This model was set up in a field and when Sima
saw it he was scared off. Sima was also known as "the man with the wolf's
neck" because of his strange ability to turn his neck 180 degrees and look
backwards.

4. ZHOU YU

Zhou Yu had close personal ties with Sun Ce (P.94). The two in their
childhood laid the foundation of the Wu kingdom. They later became in laws,
after both married beautiful daughters from the Jia family. After the
assassination of Sun Ce, Chou Yu supported Sun Ce's younger brother Sun
Jian (P.94), and helped extend the Wu Kingdom's power as a leading figure
among generals. Attacked by Cao Cao (P.81), Chou Yu insisted on fighting
while the majority of generals in the Wu army favored surrender. Zhou
managed to persuade Sun and, together with Lu Su (P.102)and Huang
Gai(P.90), he put together a scheme in which Huang tricked Cao Cao. He was
a competent naval leader and helped win the battle of Red Wall. Later Zhou
Yu successfully defeated Liu Zhang (P.101) of Ichou and Zhang Lu (P.95) of
Hanchung. However, he died at the age of 36 after falling ill on his way to

				79

attack Cao Cao. It is said that his plans and schemes were, somehow, all
known to Zhu Ge Liang (P.80). He had a fair complexion and was well versed
in music. No matter how drunk Zhou was, should a musician make a mistake he
would recognize it and turn around to glare at the man.

5. ZHUGE LIANG

Known as the Sleeping Dragon or the Hidden Dragon, Zhu Ge Liang was
recommended to Liu Bei (P.84) of the Shu Kingdom by Xu Shu (P.92), and
advisor who flatly declared that Zhu Ge could provide more and better
service than any other man. Liu Bei visited Zhu Ge's cottage three times in
order to win his help. On the third visit Liu Bei explained to Zhuge Liang
his plan to "divide the Empire into three". Zhuge Liang was impressed with
the plan. From then on, their relationship was like that of a fish to
water. Liu Bei was the water;Zhu Ge Liang was the fish.

Zhu Ge helped defeat Cao Cao's (P.81) army by acting as a messenger to Sun
Jian (P.94). He also played a key role in assisting Liu Bei to enter Shu
without shedding blood. Later, when Liu Bei was the Emperor of Shu, Zhu Ge
became Minister. After Liu Bei's death, he is supported Liu Bei's
incompetent son by managing the Shu Kingdom for him. Zhu Ge made two plans,
commemorative of his late master, to attack the Wei Kingdom. These schemes
were so clever that everyone cried upon hearing them.

Zhu Ge Liang died of illness while fighting his arch rival Suma Yi. Zhu Ge
was not a particularly good field officer but, as commander in chief, he
was considered one of the most able men in history.

				80

6. CAO CAO

Cao Cao's legal grandfather was a palace eunuch and his grandfather's
adopted son, Cao Cao's father, obtained a position by effectively offering
bribes. Deeply embarrassed by his family, Cao Cao become an accomplished
liar from childhood. At age 20, he took advantage of his keen wits and
become a police officer. He fought the Yellow Turban Rebellion, and then
helped to overthrow Jiang Wei (P.89).

Later, he established himself firmly in power by appointing one of his
puppets Emperor and, with the help of Liu Bei (P.84), defeated Lu Bu
(P.84). Cao Cao then killed Yuan Shao (P.85) at the Battle of Kuantu, and
fought with Liu Bei who was then sheltered at Chingchou. At the Battle of
Red Wall, the allied armies of Liu Bei and Sun Quan (P.82) set Cao Cao's
entire fleet on fire, but Cao Cao escaped completely unharmed and
eventually rose to be King of Wei.

Cao Cao was said to have loved poetry, but also to have been extremely cold
natured. More than anything, he is the villain of the novel. Early in the
story,  Cao Cao is traveling and stops at the house of an old friend and
sworn brother of his father's. The host knows that Cao Cao is wanted by the
authorities, but greets him warmly and goes inside the house to prepare a
meal. The man,  realizing there is no good wine in the house, goes out to
buy some.

"The two travelers sat for a long time. Suddenly they heard at the back of
the house the sound of a knife being sharpened. Cao Cao said: "He is not my
real uncle;I am beginning to doubt the meaning of his going off. Let us
listen." So they silently stepped out into the straw hut at the back.
Presently someone said:

"'Bind before killing eh?'
"'As I thought', said Cao Cao,  'Now unless we act first we shall be taken.'
"Immediately the dashed in and slew the whole household, male and female,
in all eight persons. After this they searched the house:in the kitchen
they found a pig bound ready to kill.

Cao Cao's companion laments that they have made a great mistake, to which
Cao Cao replies

"I would rather betray the whole world then let the world betray me."

				81

7. SUN QUAN

Sun Quan, the second son of Sun Ce's (P.94) younger brother Sun Jian, ruled
the Wu Kingdom at the age of 19. His accomplishments as a ruler were not
notably brilliant, but he was an extraordinary man with three superior
subordinates, Zhou Yu (P.79), Lu Meng (P.102) and Lu Xun (P.99), all of
whom remained loyal to him throughout his rule.

Politically, he was flexible and bold. At the Battle of Red Wall, Sun Quan
joined forces with Liu Bei (P.84) and Zhu Ge Liang (P.80) in an attempt to
defeat Cao Cao (P.81). At the Battle of Iling, he allied his forces with
Cao Cao to kill Guan Yu (P.78) and took over the entire region of
Chingchou. While the Wei and Shu Kingdoms were engaged in war, he
established the Wu Kingdom as an independent state in the Chiangtun area.

He was decisive and was said to be a competent leader. At a meeting with
his army commanders before the Battle of Red Wall, he rallied the fighting
spirit of his men by instantly calling for a war against Cao Cao. He then
suddenly cut a nearby table in two and said he would do the same to anyone
who disagreed with his decisions in the future.

8. ZHAO YUN

Zhao Yun first served Gong Sun Zan (P.90) in the fight to break up the
Yellow Turban Rebellion. Later, he became Liu Bei's (P.84) subordinate.
Zhao Yun was well known for his courage. Once, when Cao Cao(P.81)was
attacking Ch'angpan, he fought with Liu Bei's baby son tucked under his
robe. Upon his return, Liu Be said to him:"I can have more babies, but I
may never have such a great captain as you," and for emphasis threw the
baby aside. Liu Bei's remark so moved Zhao Yun that he replied: "Were I
ground to powder I could not prove my gratitude".

Zhao fought in many wars and earned a great reputation. He is especially
remembered for a brilliantly enacted withdrawal at Hanchung after
unexpectedly running into Wei's troops. At the Battle of Ch'ishan, in spite
of the fact that he was 70 years old, he defeated three young generals of
Wei and took one of them hostage.

				82

9. Zhang Fei

Zhang Fei is best known for having sworn brotherhood to Liu Bei (P.84) and
Zhu Ge Liang (P.80) in the "peach garden oath". He stood six feet three
inches tall, had a pointed chin and a 'tiger's' mustache and a voice that
is said to have sounded like thunder. When Liu Bei was defeated at the
Battle of Ch'angan, he held off Cao Cao's (P.81) pursuing army with only 20
warriors placed at a bridge. Zhang Fei liked to drink more than any other
character in Romance of the Three Kingdoms. He paid men senior to him due
respect, but treated those beneath him brutally. He was killed in his sleep
by subordinates just before setting out to fight the army of the Wu
Kingdom. Liu Bei is said to have instantly felt his brother's death at the
sight of the messenger.

10. MA CHAO

Ma Chao's father Ma Teng (P.97) was killed during one of several attempts
to assassinate Cao Cao (P.81). After that, Ma Chao sought revenge for his
father's death. He attempted, together with Han Sui, to raise an army to
attack Cao Cao and was forced to take refuge with Zhang Yu at Hanchung.
Hanchung was subsequently attacked by Liu Bei (P.84). At first Ma Chao
fought Liu Bei but,  amazed by Liu Bei's charisma, surrendered to Liu Bei
and went on to play a major role as a general of the Shu army.

Ma Chao's bravery was considered to be nearly the equal of Zhanng Fei's
(P.83). Upon hearing of Ma Chao's reputation Guan Yu (P.78) asked Zhu Ge
Liang about him. Zhu Ge flattered Guan saying that "If there is anyone
superior to Ma Chao in the empire, it is you, general."

				83

11. LIU BEI

Liu Bei, a descendant of the Han line, established the Shu Kingdom and
become its first emperor. In his early years he earned a living by selling
straw sandals and by weaving mats. When the Yellow Turban Rebellion broke
out he decided to raise an army in order to bring about peace in the
empire. It was then that he took the "peach tree oath", promising
brotherhood to Guan Yu (P.78) and Zhang Fei (P.83). For a long time Liu Bei
wandered the country participating in various battles and experiencing
occasional defeats. He took shelter on occasion with Cao Zhen, Cao Cao
(P.81), Yuan Shao (P.85) and Liu Biao (P.101).

Liu Bei then met Zhu Ge Liang (P.80). Zhu Ge Liang had a plan to divide the
empire into three parts, which Liu Bei thought workable. Liu Bei won the
Battle of Red Wall, seized the Shu district and gradually expanded his
territory. When Guan Yu was assassinated by Sun Quan (P.82), Liu Bei sought
revenge but before the opportunity arose was himself assassinated by Lu Xun
(P.99). He died at the age of 63. 

Liu Bei may not have been a statesman to equal his rivals, Cao Cao and Sun
Quan, but he had a great deal of charm, which he used as his foremost
weapon. He was said to have had large ears and good peripheral vision.

12. LU BU

Lu Bu lived at the end of the second Han Dynasty. He is best known for
coming to the city of Loyang to participate in a plot led by Ho Chin to
kill the palace eunuchs. He later decided to join Dong Zhuo (P.95\6) and
cut off his former master's head which he brought to Dong as a gift. Later,
both men fell for the same woman and Lu killed Dong.

After killing Dong, Lu Pu traveled around the country visiting Yuan Shao
(P.85), Yuan Shu (P.85), and other generals. He finally came to Liu
Bei(P.84)for shelter. He came to serve Liu Bei, but soon betrayed him to
return to Yuan Shu. This betrayal forced Liu Bei to leave the area and go
to Cao Cao (P.81). Because of his treachery and brutality Lu Bu was called
The Wolf or The Hawk. He was a superb archer and horseman.

				84

13. YI JI

Yi Ji was serving Liu Bian (P.101) at the same time Liu Bei (P.84) was
staying in Chingchou under Liu Biao's protection. Yi Ji was attracted to
Liu Biao's strong personality. He thus decided to warn Liu Biao that he was
going to be assassinated at an upcoming meeting. From then on, Yi Ji served
Liu Biao as a loyal subordinate and acted as a messenger to the Wu Kingdom.

14. YUAN SHU

Yuan Shu was either one of Yuan Shao's (P.85) nephews or one of his younger
brothers. He first became known during the Yellow Turban rebellion and was
involved in the massacre of the palace eunuchs, together with Yuan Shao.
Being ambitious, he planned to establish a vast empire to be ruled by the
Yuan family, but he was opposed by Yuan Shao and escaped to Huainan, which
he claimed as his own. His love of luxury and ambition cost him any hope of
widespread support. Lacking the ability to rule, he was eventually defeated
by Cao Cao (P.81) and Lu Bu (P.84).

15. YUAN SHAO

It was Yuan Shao who led the massacre of the palace eunuchs. When Dong Zhuo
(P.96) entered the capital city of Loyang, Yuan Shao fled, afraid of Dong
Zhuo's power. Later, when Cao Cao (P.81) called for an alliance among
regional leaders to overthrow Dong Zhuo, Yuan Shao became a major figure.

Yuan Shao had no interest in restoring the Han line, but rather endeavored
to extend his own power. He retreated during a battle with Cao Cao after
two of his most important subordinates were slain. Proud of coming from a
prominent family, Yuan Shao had many noble traits but his lack of ambition
finally led to the destruction of the Yuan family.

				85

16. JIA XU

Well known from his early years as an extremely competent tactician, it was
he who advised Li Zhi to occupy Ch'angan after Dong Zhuo's (P.96) murder,
and drove Lu Bu (P.84) away from the palace. Later, as one of Zhang Xiu's
subordinates, he managed to see through all of Cao Cao's (P.81) schemes and
thus avoid his attacks. At the battle of Kuantu, however, a Jia Xu
surrendered to Cao Cao, disdaining Yuan Shao's (P.85) offer of a position.
From that point on he served Cao Cao, and Cao Cao's son.

17 GUO JIA

On the recommendation of Gu Yu, Guo Jia was allowed to become one of Cao
Cao's (P.81) subordinates. he masterminded the water borne attack on Lu Bu
(P.84), which brough victory even though several previous attempts had
failed. At the battle of Kuantu, he predicted that Sun Ce (P.94) would not
be able to attack Cao Cao from the rear. This prediction proved correct
when Sun Ce was assassinated shortly there after. It was also Guo Jia who
insisted on taking over Chingchou, which was in Liu Bei's (P.84) hands. Guo
Jia dies at an early age.

18. KUO TU

Kuo Tu served Yuan Shao (P.85). He strongly advised Yuan to fight Cao Cao
(P.81) at the first opportunity.

				86

19. XIA HOU YUAN

Xia Hou Yuan came from the same family as Xia Hou Dun (P.87). He served
under Cao Cao (P.81) from the time Cao Cao first raised an army and
participated in a variety of battles. He was considered to be among the
bravest of men. He married one of Cao Cao's sisters. As a general under Cao
Cao, he led his troops to victory when Ma Chao (P.83) and Han Sui attacked
the Chang Pass. He was later killed in battle by Huang Zhong (P.78).

20. XIA HOU DUN

Xia Hou Dun was said to have been a nephew of Cao Cao's (P.81) paternal
line. After Cao Cao raised his army, Xia Hou Dun participated in many
battles and his reputation grew. During the fight against Lu Bu(P.84), Xia
Hou Dun was struck in the left eye by an arrow. He pulled out the arrow,
together with the eye, and ate the eye saying "I dare not throw away the
essence of my parents". After that, he was called "Blind Xia Hou" to
distinguish himself from his brother, Yun.

21. GAN NING

Gan Ning was a general in Sun Quan's (P.82) army. He led the Wu Kingdom's
naval force, the most powerful of the time. Shortly before the Battle of
Red Wall, he lead an amphibious attack that defeated the naval forces of
both Xia Hou Mao and Zhang Yun.

				87

22. GUAN PING

Raised as Guan Yu's (P.78) son, Guan Ping was actually adopted by Guan Yu
during Guan Yu's journey to rejoin Liu Bei (P.84) after obtaining his
freedom from Cao Cao (P.81). Guan Ping held several important positions,
but was killed together with his father at Chingchou while guarding a
castle against an allied attack by the Wei and Wu kingdoms.

23. YAN LIANG

A bold general and fierce fighter, Yan Liang served Yuan Shao (P.85). He
was eventually killed by Guan Yu's (P.78) especially made sword, the Black
Dragon. Yan Liang was said to be brave but narrow minded.

24. WEI YAN

When Cao Mai attacked Liu Bei (P.84), Wei Yan helped repel the invasion and
then himself escaped, finding shelter with Han Xuan of Changsha. Later,
when Liu Bei's army attacked Han Xuan. Wei Yan was serving with Huang
Zhang, one of Han Xian's generals, and the both of them surrendered to Liu
Bei to avoid punishment from Cao Mai. Subsequently, Wei Yan continued to
serve under Huang Zhang, but working for Liu Bei, not Han Xuan. He
eventually was given the rank of perfect, but was killed during a battle
with Yang Yi.

				88

25. JIANG WEI

Jiang Wei first served in the Wei Kingdom but later, attracted by Zhu Ge
Liang's (P.80) personality, joined the Shu army. When Zhu Ge died of
illness on the Wuchang Plain. Jiang Wei, following his master's last wish,
carefully constructed a wooden image of Zhu Ge. Sima Yi (P.79) saw this
image and, convinced that Zhu Ge was still alive, fled the battle.

When it came to policy making in the Shu Kingdom, Jiang Wei was aggressive
and determined to expand at nearly and cost. This put him in direct
opposition to the more conservative Fei Wei. After Fei Wei's death, however
Jiang Wei often attacked parts of the Wei Kingdom. In spite of this, the
King of Shu surrendered eventually to the Wei Kingdom and Jiang Wei became
its subject. He tried to take advantage of this and stage a coupe against
the King of Wei, but was killed in the attempt.

26. XU ZHU

Xu Zhu once fought a battle against Cao Cao's (P.81) herculean general Dian
Wei. Cao Cao, impressed with Xu Zhu's strength, set a trap to capture him.
The trap worked and Xu Zhu agreed to serve Cao Cao. Xu Zhu subsequently won
several battles for Cao Cao and helped him escaped from the Battle of Red
Wall after his defeat. Because of his brilliance and straightforwardness,
Xu Zhu became known as the "Passionate Tiger".

27. JI LING

A general serving Yuan Shu (P.85), Ji Ling attacked Hsiaop'ei in an attempt
to comply with his master's orders and kill Liu Bei (P.84). Lu Bu (P.84),
however, stepped in an helped Liu Bei by acting as a peacemaker with Yuan
Shu. Ji Ling then retreated with his army.

				89

28. YAN YAN

A well known general in the Shu army, Yan Yan was old but as skillful an
archer as any young man. When Liu Bei (P.84) attacked the Shu kingdom, Yan
Yan fought against Zhang Fei (P.83). Realizing that Yan Yan's defenses were
too strong to be easily overrun, Zhang Fei decided to rely on trickery. In
front of Yan Yan's spies he claimed that he would lead his army to Lohsien.
As Zhang Fei foresaw, Yen Yen waited to ambush him on the road to Lohsien.
However, Zhang Fei managed to ambush and capture Yan Yan. From that point
on, Yan Yan served obediently in the Shu army.

29. HUANG GAI

Huang Gai served three generations of the Sun family: Sun Jian (P.94), Sun
Ce (P.94) and Sun Quan (P.82). At the Battle of Red Wall, Huang Gai put
together a plan to set Cao Cao's (P.81) fleet on fire. In order to convince
Cao Cao that there was no danger of a fire attack, Huang Gai proposed just
such an attack in public and had himself whipped one hundred times in front
of known spies for suggesting a bad plan. Cao Cao fell for the ruse, and
this was the key reason for his defeat.

30. GONG SUN ZAN

A local official before the Yellow Turban Rebellion, Gong Sun's good
appearance, voice and practical way of thinking earned him the favor of the
region's governor. Because of this favor Gong Sun was allowed to study and
become a scholar. Later, Liu Bei (P.84) became Gong Sun's pupil, and like a
younger brother. When the Yellow Turban Rebellion occurred, Gong Sun and
Liu fought together. Following the rebellion, Gong Sun established himself
in the North and built a strong castle. Yuan Shao (P.85) first laid siege
to the castle and then tunneled into it. Rather than be captured by Yuan
Shao (P.85) first laid siege to the castle and then tunneled into it.
Rather than be captured by Yuan, Gong Sun and his entire family committed
suicide.

				90

31. CAI MAO

Coming from a powerful family in Chingchou, Cai Mao helped Liu Biao (P.101)
to take control of the district. In return for this, he was able to place
his eldest sister as Liu Biao's second wife, and his niece as the wife of
Liu Biao's younger son, Liu Cong. Through these devices Cai hoped to gain
the favor of the Liu Family. He then attempted to assassinate Liu's eldest
son to allow the younger son to come to power. Liu Bei (P.84) was upset by
this, so Cai Mao decided the best course of action was to assassinate him
and take control directly. However, Liu Bei, acting on a tip from Yi Ji
(P.85), successfully escaped the attempt.

Later, Cai Mao led a naval force for Cao Cao (P.81), but was accused of
treason and executed shortly before the Battle of Red Wall.

32. GOU YU

Raised by a prominent family, Gou Yu was well known from childhood for his
great ability and physical attractiveness. He first served Yuan Shao (P.85)
but, disgusted at the latter's lack of ability, left him to become an
adviser to Cao Cao (P.81). At the Battle of Kuantu, he encouraged a
distressed Cao Cao towards victory. It was he who advised Cao Cao to
establish Xian Di as emperor before attempting to extending his power. Gou
Yu remained in Cao Cao's favor until he opposed Cao Cao's ascension to
King.

33. ZHU GE JIN

Zhu Ge Jin was an adviser to Sun Quan (P.82) of Wu, and an elder brother of
Zhu Ge Liang (P.80). Some army commanders in the Wu Kingdom suspected that
Zhu Ge might be passing information to his brother in the Shu Kingdom. But
Sun Quan trusted him and frequently sent him as a messenger to Shu. He also
had Zhu Ge negotiated on Wu's behalf during negotiations over the control of
Chingou. Zhu Ge Jin and Zhu Ge Liang are said to have never met as
brothers, though they did see each other occasionally at official
functions.

				91

34. XU HUANG

Xu Huang fought against Xu Zhu (P.89) to prevent him from entering Hsutu
after Cao Cao (P.81), taking advantage of the prevailing confusion in the
country put Xian Di, his own puppet, on the throne as emperor. Cao Cao
watched the battle and was impressed enough with Xu Huang to ask him to
join his own force.

After the Battle of Red Wall, Xu Huang protected Chiangling from the Wu
Army's attacks and also helped Cao Hong (P.92) hold the Chang pass. When
Guan Yu (P.78) surrendered Fancheng, where Cao Ren (P.93) was confined, Xu
Huang led an army to support Cao Ren. The Wu army joined him and Xu Huang
struck to gain ground,  forcing the enemy to retreat.

35. XU SHU

Xu Shu received training in the sword when he was a very young man. When he
grew older he turned to more bookish study and met Zhu Ge Liang (P.80), who
was very impressed with his ability.

Xu Shu quickly became a commander under Liu Be (P.84), who sought an able
man to lead his army at Chingchou. He was forced to leave Lu Bei when Cao
Cao took his mother hostage. However, before leaving he showed Liu detailed
military plans he had made and strongly recommended Zhu Ge Liang. When
serving Cao Cao (P.81) he did as told, but made it a point to do no more.

36. CAO HONG

A nephew of Cao Cao (P.81), Cao Hong was a loyal Wei subject and served his
uncle together with Cao Ren (P.93). During the Battle of Yungyang against
Dong Zhuo (P.96), Cao Hong offered his horse to help Cao Cao escape, saying
"The empires needs you, not me". On another occasion, when Cao Cao was
injured he helped him swim across a major river. At the battle of Kuantu he
maintained a defensive force at Wei headquarters, while Cao Cao attacked
Wuch'ao, where Yuan Shao's (P.85) army kept most of its supplies cached.

				92

37. CAO REN

One of Cao Cao's (P.81) nephews, Cao Ren was known as a successful and
competent commander capable of leading armies to victory. After the Battle
of Red Wall, he blocked the pursuit of the Wu army by staying at
Chiangling with Xu Huang (P.92). After Liu Bei (P.84) came to power in
Hanchung, Cao Ren defended Fanch'eng from attacks by Guan Yu (P.78). Later,
when Sun Quan (P.82) attacked Fanch'eng, he retreated after burning two
castles, one at Fanch'eng and the other Yungyang.

38. CAO PI

As the second son of Cao Cao (P.81), Cao Pi waged a violent struggle
against his younger brother, Cai Zhi, for the throne. He succeeded, first
becoming Prince of Wei and then, on the death of his father, becoming first
emperor of the Wei Dynasty. More a scholar than a warrior, Cao Pi was a
pioneer of literary criticism in China and laid the foundation for a new
aristocratic system.

39. SUN GAN

A devoted subject of Liu Bei (P.84), Sun Gan joined Liu Bei's army after
being recommended by Tao Qian of Hsuchou. He served as a messenger to Yuan
Shao (P.85) when Liu Bei raised an army against Cao Cao (P.81) at Hsuchou.
He was also sent to Liu Biao (P.101) to ask him to provided Liu Bei with
shelter at Junan. Sun Gan continued to contribute to the Shu army until his
death.

				93

40. SUN JIAN

The father of Sun Ce (P.94) and Sun Quan (P.82), at age 17 Sun Jian
defeated a band of pirates and was made an officer. At age 28 he was
involved in the defeat of the Yellow Turban Rebellion and was given a high
office in Changsha. At the time allied forces were formed under Yuan
Shao(P.85)to defeat Dong Zhuo (P.96), Sun Jian was the first to enter
Loyang as a subject of Yuan Shu (P.85), and found a jade seal in an old
well.

Later, he fought against Liu Biao (P.101) of Chingchou under the command of
Yuan Shu and showed bravery in defeating Huang Zu's army, although he was
killed by an arrow fired by one of Huang's men. Sun Jian's unfulfilled
takes were transferred to his son Sun Ce, who in turn laid the foundation
of the Wu kingdom for his grandson, Sun Quan.

4Q. SUN CE

A son of Sun Jian (P.94) and a brother of Sun Quan (P.82), Sun Ce was a
good friend of Zhou Yu's (P.79) from childhood. Both married beautiful
daughters of the Chao family. Sun Ce married the eldest sister while Chou
Yu married the second. After his father's death, Sun Ce served Yuan Shu
(P.85) for a time but gradually detached himself, built his own power base
at Chingung and became known as the "Little Chief of the Feudal Lords". He
was killed at age 26 by a poisoned arrow, quite possibly shot by an agent
of Cao Cao's (P.81).

42. TAI SHI CI

Tai Shi Ci served Liu Yao of Yuanchou and fought against Sun Ce (P.94) to
the end, even though his entire army had been destroyed. Sun Ce came to
admire Tai Shi Ci, so he captured him in battle and took him into his own
service. When Tai Shi Ci entered Sun Ce's service, he promised that he
would bring 3,000 soldiers if given three days. Then, good as his word, he
brought a total of 3,000 soldiers to Sun Ce inside three days. Later, when
fighting in Sun Jian's (P.94) service, he was caught in a trap and killed
by multiple arrows.

				94

43. ZHANG SONG

A subject of Liu Zhang (P.101) of Shu, when attacked by Zhang Lu (P.95) he
went to Cao Cao (P.81) to seek help. However, Cao Cao ignored his requests
and treated him badly, due in large part to his grotesque appearance. Zhang
Song then turned to Liu Bei (P.84), who gave him a warm welcome. Because he
was charmed by Liu Bei's warm personality, Liu Bei decided to give him
control over the Shu district. Zhang conspired with Fa Zheng and Meng Da to
prepare for Liu Bei's takeover of the area. However, Zhang Song was
executed after his elder brother Zhang Su informed Liu Zhang of Zhang
Song's secret intentions.

44. ZHANG LIAO

Zhang Liao served a variety of generals, including Dong Zhuo (P.96) and Lu
Bu (P.84). When Lu Bu was killed at Hsiaop'ei by Cao Cao (P.81), Zhang Liao
was blamed for negligence and only saved from execution at the last minute
by Guan Yu (P.78).

After that he won several battles under Cao Cao. during one engagement
after the Battle of Red Wall, he defeated Sun Quan's (P.82) army of
1000,000 men with only 800 troops.

45. ZHANG LU

The leader of a religious group, Zhang Lu followed a set of doctrines first
proposed by his grandfather and established an independent state in
Hanchung. This state sought peace without discrimination, and did not have
martial law, a large police force or exorbitant taxes. This utopia lasted
for about 30 years until Cao Cao (P.81) managed to take over the area after
a series of battles. Following Cao Cao's takeover, Zhang Lu became a
general in Cao Cao's army.

				95

46. CHENG YU

A strategist in Wei, Cheng Yu enjoyed Gou Yu (P.91) and Cao Cao's (P.81)
deepest trust. Although he was said to cooperate poorly with other, Cheng
Yu often bore responsibility for running Cao Cao's headquarters when Cao
Cao was not present,  and together with Gou Yu played a major hand in
laying the foundation for the Wei Kingdom. He strongly opposed Cao Cao's
receiving Liu Bei (P.84) as a guest, and even went so far as to suggest
that Liu Bei should be assassinated.

47. CHENG PU

The oldest general in Wu, Cheng Pu was highly loyal to Sun Gan (P.93), and
fought with him against the Yellow Turban Rebellion. He subsequently served
Sun Gan's son, Sun Ce (P.92), with a similarly high degree of loyalty.
After Sun Ce's death,  he worked together with Zhang Zhao for Sun Quan
(P.82). Cheng Pu was generous and displayed an ability to find and employ
good men.

48. DONG ZHUO

Dong Zhuo was a key figure in the ruin of the second Han Dynasty and the
subsequent rise of the Three Kingdoms. When young, Dong Zhuo traveled
widely. Later, he took advantage of the Yellow Turban Rebellion and a power
struggle within the palace to take power in Loyang.

After taking power, Dong Zhou committed a host of atrocities, including
plunder and murder, which horrified the people of Loyang. He transferred the
capital to Ch'angan, where he stole gold, silver and gems from the tombs of
earlier Chinese emperors. His conduct angered and distressed many people.
When Wang Yu and Lu Bu (P.84) assassinated him, the body was displayed
publicly amid widespread rejoicing.

				96

49. MA SU

Known as White Eyebrows, Ma Su was one of Ma Liang's younger brothers. The
subject of great praise by Zhu Ge Liang (P.80), Ma Sun followed Zhu Ge
Liang as Secretary of the Shu Kingdom. During the war of Chieht'ing, when
the Shu Kingdom waged war to take the central area of the country, he
confronted Zhang He of Wei. Ma Su disobeyed one of of Zhu Ge Liang's
orders, and in so doing forced Zhu Ge Lian to retreat. Later, despite the
personal pain it caused him, Zhu Ge publicly executed Ma to maintain
military discipline.

50 MA DAI

Ma Dai's cousin Ma Teng (P.97) made several attempts on Cao Cao's (P.81)
life but caught and executed. After his cousin's death, Ma Dai fled to his
homeland in order to escape possible punishment by Cao Cao. Later, together
with Ma Chao (P.83), he raised an army to attack Cao Cao. His plan failed,
however, forcing him to seek shelter with Zhang Lu (P.95) of Hanchung.
Later, he fought against Liu Bei (P.84) under Zhang Lu's command, while Ma
Chao worked for Liu Bei to overthrow Cao Cao. Both Ma Dai and Ma Chao
fought several battles on behalf of Shu.

51. MA TENG

The father of Ma Chao (P.83), Ma Teng was tall and had a frightful face,
but a warm personality. Part Mongolian, Ma Teng had a large force of good
soldiers serving under him at Hsiliang. He was part of a conspiracy,
organized by Dong Cheng, to assassinate Cao Cao (P.81). The plan failed and
Ma Teng was forced to flee. Later, Ma Teng was killed while making a second
attempt on Cao Cao's life. His two sons were also part of the attempt and
Ma Chao was the only one left alive. He swore to take revenge and to rule
Liang.

				97

52. MI ZHU

A loyal servant of Shu, Mi Zhu was one of Liu Bei's (P.84) greatest assets.
Coming from a prominent family, he was also a wealthy man in his own right.
He went so far as to support Liu Bei financially when Liu Bei's
headquarters was taken by Lu Bu (P.84). Before Liu Bei entered Chingchou,
Mi Zhu was sent as a messenger to Liu Biao (P.101), who ruled the area.

53. WEN CHOU

Wen Chou served Yuan Shao (P.85) and, together with Yan Liang (P.88), was
well known as a man of great power. During a battle between Yuan Shao and
Gong Sun Zan (P.90) he almost killed Gong Sun but was stopped when Zhao Yun
(P.82) came to Gong Sun's defense. Wen Chou met his end at the hands of Cao
Cao's (P.81) army at the battle of Kunatu.

54. PANG TONG

Said to have been Zhu Ge Liang's (P.80) intellectual equal, Pang Tong was
called the Phoenix Fledgling, while Zhu Ge Liang was known as "the Hidden
Dragon". Xu Shu (P.92) once said to Liu Bei (P.84): "If you could find
either the Hidden Dragon or the Phoenix Fledgling, you could restore order
to the empire."

Pang Tong was directly responsible for Cao Cao's (P.81) defeat at the
battle of Red Wall. Pang Tong managed to convince Cao Cao that tying all
his ships together with iron chains would allow them to navigate rough
waters better. The real purpose was to make it easier for Sun Quan (P.82)
and Liu Bei, with whom he was in secret communication, to set all of Cao
Cao's ships on fire. Pang Tong died at age 36, shot by an arrow while on
his way to Ch'engtu.

				98

55. PANG DE

Pang De, together with Han Sui, joined the army Ma Chao (P.83) raised to
attack Cao Cao (P.91). He, however, became ill and did not actually
participate in the battle against Cao Cao. Later, when Cao Cao attacked
Hanchung, Pang De helped Chang Lu and fought against Xu Zhu (P.89).
However, when the battle was over he served Cao Cao.

56. MENG HUO

Meng Huo made several attempts to overthrow the Shu government. Following
Liu Chan's (P.101) order, Zhu Ge Liang (P.80) captured and released Meng
Huo seven times. When captured an eight time Meng Huo realized he was
merely being toyed with an refused to be go.

57. LU XUN

Lu Xun served Sun Quan (P.82) and contributed to the development of the Wu
kingdom. After being recommended by Lu Meng (P.102), Lu Xun was allowed to
lead the battle against Guan Yu (P.78) at Chingchou. Although he was young,
Lu Xun displayed an impressive flair for tactics and managed to capture
Guan Yu. When Liu Bei (P.84) raised an army to seek revenge for this, Lu
Xun first extended the battle to exhaust the Shu army and then attacked,
forcing Liu Bei to retreat. Liu Bei subsequently fell seriously ill. For
this, Lu Xun received a special promotion. He was entirely trusted by Sun
Quan but was viewed with reservation by many of Sun Quan's other
commanders.

				99

58. LI RU

Li Ru, one of Dong Zhuo's (P.96) most loyal followers, served Emperor Xian
Di as a chamberlain. Li Ru tried to force the emperor and his wife to drink
poison tea. When they refused to do so, he killed both of them with his own
hands. Li Ru convinced Dong Zhuo to transfer the capital from Loyang to
Ch'angan when opposition in Loyang became dangerously strong. Li Ru was
responsible for a good deal of plunder in Ch'angan, as well as the defeat
of Cao Cao (P.81) at Yungyang.

59. LIU YAN

Liu Yan first served as governor of Yichou and then brought peace XO and
enjoyed widespread popular support as King of Shu. This era of peace ended
when Liu Bei (P.84) took over the land.

60. LIU QI

Liu Qi was the eldest son of Liu Biao (P.101), ruler of Chingchou. In large
part due to pressure from Cao Mao, Liu Biao greatly favored his second son,
Liu Cong, even to the point of awarding him the right of succession that
should have belonged to Liu Qi. Realizing his life was in danger, Liu Qi
fled Chingchou and received Zhu Ge Liang's (P.80) protection, but soon
linked up with Liu Bei (P.84). At this time Cao Cao (P.81) took Chingchou.
Liu Qi subsequently took Chingchou back and was made its governor, but dies
of illness shortly after.

				100

61. LIU ZHANG

Liu Zhang succeeded his father as governor of Yichou. When he heard of Cao
Cao's (P.81) plan to invade, he sought the advice of Zhang Song (P.95), Fa
Zheng and a variety of others on what to do. The consensus was that the
army did not have the means to withstand Cao Cao when he attacked, but rule
by Cao Cao was unacceptable. Liu Zhang decided to invite Liu Bei (P.84) in
and simply give him the area. Thus, Liu Bei took Yichou without a fight.

62. LIU CHAN

Liu Chan was Liu Bei's (P.84) son and successor as the second Emperor of
Shu. During the battle of Ch'angpan, Liu Chan was saved from Cao Cao's
(P.81) forces by Zhao Yun (P.82). Unlike his father, who was very wise, Liu
Chan was an idiot. In spite of this, the Shu kingdom remained peaceful
since he had Zhu Ge Liang (P.80), Jiang Wan, and Fei Wei to actually run
things. However, after their deaths, Liu Chan put his trust in a corrupt
palace eunuch and the kingdom rapidly fell into decline, becoming easy prey
for the Wei kingdom. Later, Liu Chan's name came to be used to refer to an
incompetent person.

63. LIU BIAO

A member of the Han line, Liu Biao was also well known as a Confucian
scholar. He gained control of Chingchou and managed to protect it from
several take over attempts staged by Yuan Shao (P.85) and Yuan Shu (P.85).

For about 15 years, Chingchou maintained a state of peace and prosperity.
Many famous scholars gathered in the area to study at an institution
sponsored by Liu Biao. After 15 years, however, Liu Cong. Liu Biao's son,
turned Chingchou over to Cao Cao (P.81) without a fight.

				101

64. LU MENG

Lu Meng served Sun Ce (P.94) and Sun Quan (P.82). Raised in a poor home, Lu
Meng did not initially receive a good education. He was, however, extremely
confident of his own abilities. Under Sun Quan's sponsorship he learned the
arts of the pen and sword, showing great aptitude for both. It was Lu Meng
who used young Lu Xun (P.99) to defeat Guan Yu (P.78). Shortly after Guan
Yu's death, Lu Meng, himself, fell ill and died. This illness was said to
have been the revenge of Guan Yu's ghost.

65. LU SU

A close friend of Zhou Yu (P.79), Lu Su became one of Sun Quan's (P.82)
closest advisors after being introduced to him by Zhou Yu. When Cao Cao
(P.81) attacked Sun Quan, Lu Su immediately proposed that Sun Quan form an
alliance with Liu Bei (P.84)t o defeat Cao Cao. As a result, the allied
forces of Sun Quan and Liu Bei won the Battle of Red Wall.

After Zhou Yu's death, Lu Su acted as ambassador to a number of other
states. Wu's establishment as a kingdom was largely his doing.

				102

CHRONOLOGICAL TABLE OF ROMANCE OF THE THREE KINGDOMS

YEAR
(A.D.)					EVENT

184	Outbreak of Yellow Turban Rebellion. Ho Chin appointed to suppress
	the rebels. Cao Cao was 30. Sun Jian 29, and Liu Bei 24. Being
	ambitious, they all rendered meritorious service in their
	respective areas. Liu Bei, Guan Yu and Zhang Fei pledged
	brotherhood in a peach garden just before going off to fight the
	rebels.

189	Ho Chin was assassinated by palace eunuchs. Yuan Shao and Yuan Shu
	killed as many as 2,000 eunuchs in revenge. Meanwhile, Dong Zhuo 
	extended his power and conquered the capital city of Loyang. Yuan
	Shao, Yuan Shu, Cao Cao and others fled from Loyang.

190	Brave men in almost every region raised armies to overthrow Dong
	Zhuo who set the capital of Loyang on fire and moved to Ch'angan.
	Cao Cao attempted to kill Dong Zhuo.

192	Yuan defeated Gong Sun Zan. Wang Yu and Lu Bu assassinated Dong
	Zhuo. Li Zui and Guo Su killed Wang Yu and occupied Ch'angan city.
	Lu Bu escaped. Sun Jian died and was succeeded by his son Sun Ce.

193	Cao Cao defeated Tao Qian. Famines occurred over a large part of
	the country.

194	After Tao Qian's death. Liu Bei came to power in Hsuchou.

195	Defeated by Cao Cao. Lu Bu sought shelter with Liu Bei. Sun Ce 
	attempted to take control on Chiangtun.

				103

YEAR
(A.D.)					EVENT

196	While Liu Bei was battling Yuan Shu. Lu Bu took over Hsuchou. Cao
	Cao set up a new emperor and went to Ch'angan Liu Bei was captured
	by Cao Cao but treated kindly.

197	Cao Cao won a battle against Yuan Shu. Sun Ce established an
	independent state in Chiangtun.

198	Cao Cao killed Lu Bu and Lu's adviser Chen Lu.

199	Liu Bei joined in a conspiracy to assassinate Cao Cao and fled to
	Hsuchou. Yuan Shu died.

200	Liu Bei sought refuge with Yuan Shao. Guan Yu was taken hostage by
	Cao Cao. He rendered meritorious service to Cao Cao and was allowed
	to escape. Cao Cao defeated Yuan Shao's army. Sun Ce died and his
	son. Sun Quan succeeded him.

201	Liu Bei was defeated by Cao Cao at Junan and took shelter with Liu
	Biao of Chingchou.

202	Yuan Shao died.

204	Cao Cao took Yuan Shao's territory.

205	Cao Cao conquered the northern Kingdom of Wei.

207	Zhu Ge Liang agreed to serve Liu Bei as commander in chief. Zhu Ge
	explained his plan to divide the empire into three parts. Liu Bei's
	first son, Liu Chan was born.

208	Cao Cao became a minister and raised an army to take the south. Liu
	Bei experienced another defeat at Ch'angan. At the Battle of Red
	Wall the allied forces of Liu Bei and Sun Quan used an incendiary
	attack to defeat Cao Cao.

210	Zhu Ge Liang's counterpart Chou Yu of Wu died of illness.

211	Liu Be was welcomed by the people of Shu.

212	Sun Quan made Nanking his base.

213	Cao Cao took complete power in Wei. Pang Tong dies while attacking
	Lohsien with Liu Bei.

				104

YEAR
(A.D.)					EVENT

214	Liu Bei took control of Ichou. Liu Bei and Sun Quan confronted each
	other over Chingchou.

215	Cao Cao took command of Hanchung. As a result of negotiations
	between Zhu Ge Liang and his elder brother, Zhu Ge Jin. Liu Bei and
	Sun Quan divided Chingchou into two parts.

216	Cao Cao became Emperor of Wei.

217	Liu Bei attacked Hanchung. In the same year a plague spread
	throughout the country.

218	Cao Cao raised an army to defeat Liu Bei.

219	Liu Bei took control of Hanchung. Guan Yu was attacked by both Cao
	Cao and Sun Quan. Both he and his son, Guan Ping, were murdered
	by Sun Quan who subsequently took Chingchou.

220	Cao Cao dies. His eldest son, Cao Pi changed the name of the area
	under his control To Tai Wei and took the throne for himself.

221	Liu Bei established the Shu Kingdom with Zhu Ge Liang as minister.
	Zhang Fei was murdered by angry subjects.

222	Liu Bei raised an army to avenge Guan Yu's murder. he was defeated
	by Lu Xun at the battle of Iling and escaped to Paitich'eng. Sun
	Quan established the Wu Kingdom and the Three Kingdoms period
	began.

223	Liu Bei died after leaving his eldest son in Zhu Ge Liang's care.

224	The kingdoms of Wu and Shu forged an alliance.

225	The Wei Kingdoms made several unsuccessful attacks on the Wu
	kingdom.

226	Cao Pi died of illness. Wu raised an army with the intention of
	fighting the Wei kingdom but was attacked by Suma I.

228	Zhu Ge Liang attacked the Wei Kingdom. He executed Ma Su who was
	largely responsible for the defeat in order to maintain military
	discipline.

229	Sun Quan became emperor of the Wu Kingdom.

				105

YEAR
(A.D.)					EVENT

231	Zhu Ge Liang defeated the Wei army which was lead by Suma I.

234	Zhu Ge Liang died of illness at Wuchang plain.

249	Suma I staged a coup and became minister.

251	Suma I died.

252	Sun Quan died.

256	The Shu army lost a major battle against the Wei army.

263	The Wei army entered the Shu Kingdom the Shu kingdom surrendered.
	The Wei army virtually destroyed the kingdom.

265	Suma I's grandson Suma Yen established the Chin Dynasty and was its
	first king.

279	The Chin Dynasty raised an army to fight against the Wu army.

280	The Emperor of Wu surrendered to Chin thereby unifying the empire.

				106

				INDEX

ABILITY OF SOLDIERS,  44		COMPUTER STRENGTH, 19
AGE, 42					CONFIRMING SELECTIONS, 19
ANIMATION, 7				COVERT ACTION, 34
ANIMOSITY TOWARDS YOU, 44
ARMY					DEBT, 25
  REORGANIZATION, 30			DEMONSTRATION GAME
ATTACK					  SEE NUMBER OF PLAYERS
  CHARGE, 54				DEVELOP LAND, 33
  INCENDIARY, 54			DIPLOMATIC NEGOTIATIONS, 35
  REGULAR, 53				DIVIDE, 53
  SIMULTANEOUS, 54			
  TRICK, 54				EARTHQUAKES, 48
AUTHORIZATION, 38			EMERGENCE OF CAO CAO
					   THE, 14
BATTLE DISPLAY, 49			EMPLOYED GENERALS, 27
BATTLE DISPLAY COMMANDS, 51		END GAME, 61
BODY, 42				EVENTS, 47
BUILD CASTLE, 34			EXPERIENCE, 44

CALENDAR, 23				FLOOD PROBABILITY, 47
CAPTURED GENERALS			FLOOD PREVENTION, 32
  BEHEADING, 56				FLOODS, 47
  RECRUITING, 56				FLOPPY DISK DRIVE SYSTEMS, 10
CASTLES					FREE GENERALS, 27
  SEE NUMBER OF CASTLES			FUNDS, 24
CHAOTIC WORLD
  A, 13					GENERALS, 41
CHARISMA, 43				GENERALS
COMMANDS				  FREE, 27
  SEE BATTLE DISPLAY AND, MAIN DISPLAY	  RECRUITING, 29
COMPUTER PERSONALITY, 19			  SEE ALSO CAPTURED GENERALS AND MAS-

				107

TERS					NAVAL ABILITY, 44
GIVE, 32				NUMBER OF BEAUTIFUL WOMEN, 25
GOVERNOR, 24				NUMBER OF CASTLES, 25
					NUMBER OF HORSES, 26
HARD DISK DRIVE SYSTEMS, 10		NUMBER OF PLAYERS, 18
HEX SCREEN MARKERS, 52			NUMBER OF SOLDIERS, 27
HINTS, 59
HORSES					OTHER, 40
  SEE NUMBER OF HORSES			OVERVIEW, 8

INTELLIGENCE, 43			PARAMETERS, 18
INTEREST RATES, 25			PASS, 40
INTRODUCTION, 7, 65			PEASANT LOYALTY, 26
					PLACING UNITS AND SUPPLIES, 49
JADE SEAL, 44				PLAGUE, 47
					PLUNDER, 33
KEYBOARD OPERATION, 9			POPULATION, 26
					POSITION, 42
LAND VALUE, 26				POWER, 43
LOCUSTS, 48
LOYALTY OF SOLDIERS, 44			RECRUIT, 29
LUCK, 43				RETREAT, 54
					RICE, 24
MASTER, 24
MASTER					SCENARIOS, 13
  DEATH OF, 57				SEARCH, 33
  YOUR DAUGHTER IS HIS WIFE, 46		SEASONAL EVENTS
  SEE ALSO GENERAL			  AUTUMN, 47
MASTER AND SUBORDINATE RELATIONSHIP	  SPRING, 47
  CHART, 58				SELECTING A MASTER, 18
MOVE, 28, 51				SEND, 28
MOVE					SERVICE TO YOU, 45
  SEE ALSO SWEAR AND MOVE, AND DIVIDE	SOLDIERS
MOVEMENT				  RECRUITING, 30
  NORMAL, 53				SPECIAL TAX, 29
  SEE ALSO PLACING UNITS AND SUPPLIES	STANDBY, 55

				108

STARTING THE GAME, 20
STATE, 44
STATE AND REGION, 23
SURRENDER, 55
SWEAR AND MOVE, 53

TRADE, 37
TRAIN SOLDIERS, 33

VIEW, 30, 39
VIEWING WARS BETWEEN COMPUTER
CONTROLLED MASTERS, 19

WANDER, 38
WANDERER
  ORDERS AVAILABLE TO, 38
WAR, 49
WAR
  CONDITIONS FOR VICTORY, 50
WEAPONS, 44
WOMEN
  SEE NUMBER OF BEAUTIFUL WOMEN

				109

============================================================================
   DOCS PROVIDED BY RAP AND -+*+-THE SOUTHERN STAR-+*+- for M.A.A.D.                                                               
============================================================================
